I'm not sure who else has been watching the media with an eye for Russian propaganda since my last message (https://pastebin.com/ar4GWrRT), but I think it's safe to say at this point that not even mainstream media is safe from fake news and Russian propagandists posing as journalists.

Knowing about this is a double-edged sword: on the one hand, the American people need to know they are being lied to. On the other hand, if we know there are some in the media who lie for a foreign power (and are at least decent at hiding it), that raises a question of: who else is lying? who can we trust?

And this confusion might be something the Okhrana (which I have insisted is a good name for them--the Russian people are their victims too) wants in America, especially when they have a puppet in power. The American people can't keep a hostile administration in check if they don't know what that administration is doing, and how can we know what they're doing if we can't trust the news?

This is tough for journalists too, who I think have to accept that foreign military operations have the means, motive, and will to discredit their entire profession, and all but certainly have been trying to for awhile now (just try searching "mainstream media" on any Russian propaganda site to see what I mean: https://www.google.com/search?q=site%3Ainfowars.com+%22mainstream+media%22 The general pattern is propagandists outside the mainstream call the mainstream media lairs, and propagandists inside the mainstream media try to make their accusations true).

But journalists can still take heart in this: the Okhrana wouldn't attack your profession if they didn't know it was indispensable to our country. Government for the people is impossible without an informed public, and so journalism, more than a profession, is the motor of the machinery that makes our country a democracy.

Some influential people have taken a more cynical view:


http://www.reuters.com/article/us-twenty-first-fox-ailes-newsmaker-idUSKCN1012RM
	"Before Roger, everyone in journalism was obligated to strive to be objective," said Dan Cooper, an executive who worked with Ailes in the early days of Fox News Channel. "Now, bias is considered a positive. He demolished the objective standard in journalism."


http://www.rollingstone.com/politics/news/how-roger-ailes-built-the-fox-news-fear-factory-20110525
	Out on his own, Ailes briefly returned to the passion for the theater he discovered during his college days. In perhaps the oddest chapter of his professional life, he formed a partnership with Kermit Bloomgarden – the famed producer of Death of a Salesman – and set out to conquer Broadway. 

	...As for actual journalists? "Fuck 'em," Ailes said. "It’s not a press conference – it’s a television show. Our television show. And the press has no business on the set." The young producer forced reporters to watch the events backstage on a TV monitor – just like the rest of America. "Ailes figured out a way to bring reporters to heel," Perlstein says.

	...The phenomenal political power and economic prowess of Fox News has inspired imitation. In recent years, MSNBC has tried to refashion itself as the anti-Fox, with a prime-time lineup stacked with liberal commentators. Such contortions, say media veterans, only strengthen Fox News, emboldening Ailes to tack even further to the right. “He can say, ‘I’m not doing anything anyone else isn’t doing – I’m just doing it on the other side of the fence,’ ” says Dan Rather.


https://www.usatoday.com/story/opinion/contributors/2017/05/19/roger-ailes-changed-face-journalism/333090001/
	...from a business-model standpoint, journalism attracts eyes to the medium, and holds them there long enough for advertising to do its work. As every good newspaperman will tell you, it is the advertising that pays the bills – not the subscription price.

	Roger Ailes understood this. As a media consultant and political campaign operative, Ailes didn’t possess the sense that some journalists have, of being a member of a sacred order, a special priesthood. He understood exactly where journalism stood in the pecking order of business and the demands for profits.

	...Roger Ailes had an enormous impact on journalism, in that the more establishment “brands” responded to the challenge of Fox News in ways that utterly wiped away what had existed before. Not only was their response to create programming that mimicked Fox (albeit in a mirror image way that appealed directly to more left-of-center audiences), but journalism – the reporting of news – was merged into the operations of the entertainment industry.

	The result is that journalism today suffers from a kind of image dysphoria, with many journalists confused as to who or what their profession is – and with many more stand-up comics, political activists, and average citizens believing that they too, are journalists. And the Internet has only expanded this confusion over what is or isn't journalism, by providing the technology and market reach to allow anyone to essentially start their own online newspaper.

	As a result, the practice of journalism and the veracity of journalists are less respected today than at any point in memory. This has made quite a few journalists apoplectic. I caught a news “talk” show the other day in which one journalist was outraged – screaming – because another member of the panel didn’t take her “anonymous sources” seriously. Why would he? Nobody takes any of it seriously.

	Roger Ailes didn’t make this new world alone. He merely reacted to the open bias of the 1992 election and understood that there was a huge market of consumers out there who weren’t happy either. However, his creation was so successful and the reaction to it such that the old journalism that we knew was swept away. Perhaps, forever.


Ailes wanted journalism to be little more than theatre for the masses and money for shareholders, putting ratings above truth. His influence on American culture and the culture of journalists is undeniable.

But Ailes is dead. Despite what Lonegan says, journalism isn't gone "forever:" It is up to you to decide the culture and values of journalism--the American public to decide what we expect of journalists, and journalists to decide what they expect of themselves.

And this is another reason for journalists to take heart: you can fight back. Any spy who wants to pretend he's a journalist and keep their cover has to conduct themselves like journalists. But it is up to us to decide what "to conduct yourself like a journalist" means. This is the journalist's creed:


https://journalism.missouri.edu/tabbed-content/creed-2/
	I believe in the profession of journalism.

	I believe that the public journal is a public trust; that all connected with it are, to the full measure of their responsibility, trustees for the public; that acceptance of a lesser service than the public service is betrayal of this trust.

	I believe that clear thinking and clear statement, accuracy and fairness are fundamental to good journalism.

	I believe that a journalist should write only what he holds in his heart to be true.

	I believe that suppression of the news, for any consideration other than the welfare of society, is indefensible.

	I believe that no one should write as a journalist what he would not say as a gentleman; that bribery by one’s own pocketbook is as much to be avoided as bribery by the pocketbook of another; that individual responsibility may not be escaped by pleading another’s instructions or another’s dividends.

	I believe that advertising, news and editorial columns should alike serve the best interests of readers; that a single standard of helpful truth and cleanness should prevail for all; that the supreme test of good journalism is the measure of its public service.

	I believe that the journalism which succeeds best — and best deserves success — fears God and honors Man; is stoutly independent, unmoved by pride of opinion or greed of power, constructive, tolerant but never careless, self-controlled, patient, always respectful of its readers but always unafraid, is quickly indignant at injustice; is unswayed by the appeal of privilege or the clamor of the mob; seeks to give every man a chance and, as far as law and honest wage and recognition of human brotherhood can make it so, an equal chance; is profoundly patriotic while sincerely promoting international good will and cementing world-comradeship; is a journalism of humanity, of and for today’s world.


A propagandist aiming to deceive to the public wouldn't face much trouble in Roger Aile's world--lying is already expected of them. But what can they get away with if they are expected to follow the journalist's creed? How much propaganda can hold to the standards of "clear thinking and clear statement," "accuracy," "fairness," "unmoved by pride of opinion," and "unswayed by the appeal of privilege or the clamor of the mob"? What harm can come from propagandists who must accept no "lesser service than the public service?" So you can see, the more the public and journalists alike hold journalists to such a creed worthy of a profession so vital to democracy, the less a propagandist can get away with. Our culture and standards are a defense against this attack.

Actually, despite the efforts of Aile's and the like, I believe this has been working. Even the KGB avoids lying when they can:


https://www.hsdl.org/?view&did=768335
	In his book Willing Accomplices, Clizbe quotes an unnamed KGB general who had served as chief of the residency in Vienna in 1961 and later at KGB headquarters as follows:  

		Active Measures were clandestine actions designed on the one hand to affect foreign governments, groups and influential individuals in ways favoring the objectives of Soviet policy and, on the other hand, to weaken the opposition to it. Such actions might or might not involve misinforming an adversary by distortion, concealment or invention, but in practice we got better results by exposing truth—selectively. We usually made the distinction clear. When someone would propose a measure, for instance, we would frequently ask him, ‘How much deza [disinformation] is involved in it?


This is not at all to say the KGB is honest. Rather, it is that lying by public figures and journalists still has consequences in our society--in other words, we still hold them to a standard. A propagandist that lies outright might not be able to be used as effectively again.

You can see this in play in much of their propaganda. Most of the time (and I stress *most*), the deception is not in the reporting of basic facts, but in how they are interpreted and framed. The "Trump revealed highly classified information to Russian foreign minister and ambassador" story is a good example of this:


https://www.washingtonpost.com/world/national-security/trump-revealed-highly-classified-information-to-russian-foreign-minister-and-ambassador/2017/05/15/530c172a-3960-11e7-9e48-c4f199710b69_story.html


The basic facts of the story are:
	Trump revealed highly classified information to the Russians
	The name of a city where intelligence is gathered was revealed
	Some officials said, paraphrased, that Trump's disclosures "jeopardized a critical source of intelligence on the Islamic State."

As for as I can tell, there is no reason to think these statements are false. McMaster didn't deny any of them. But he did say the "premise of the story is false," that premise being the implication that Trump's disclosures were a major problem and a blow to national security. But this comes almost entirely from how the article is worded. For example:


https://www.washingtonpost.com/world/national-security/trump-revealed-highly-classified-information-to-russian-foreign-minister-and-ambassador/2017/05/15/530c172a-3960-11e7-9e48-c4f199710b69_story.html
	...“Everyone knows this stream is very sensitive, and the idea of sharing it at this level of granularity with the Russians is troubling,” said a former senior U.S. counterterrorism official who also worked closely with members of the Trump national security team. He and others spoke on the condition of anonymity, citing the sensitivity of the subject.


It might be true that the intelligence "stream is very sensitive," and "the idea" of sharing it with the Russians is "troubling," but Trump didn't share an intelligence stream with the Russians, he shared the name of a city. It could also be true that this anonymous source is lying through his teeth--the author of the article would still be telling the truth by reporting what he says.

It's not hard to deceive someone while technically entirely telling the truth by carefully choosing your wording and sources. The WaPo article on Kushner's back-channel might be another example of this:


https://www.washingtonpost.com/world/national-security/russian-ambassador-told-moscow-that-kushner-wanted-secret-communications-channel-with-kremlin/2017/05/26/520a14b4-422d-11e7-9869-bac8b446820a_story.html
	Ambassador Sergey Kislyak reported to his superiors in Moscow that Kushner, son-in-law and confidant to then-President-elect Trump, made the proposal during a meeting on Dec. 1 or 2 at Trump Tower, according to intercepts of Russian communications that were reviewed by U.S. officials. Kislyak said Kushner suggested using Russian diplomatic facilities in the United States for the communications.

	...Kislyak reportedly was taken aback by the suggestion of allowing an American to use Russian communications gear at its embassy or consulate — a proposal that would have carried security risks for Moscow as well as the Trump team.


Note that the authors are quoting Kislyak, not exactly a reliable source. An important detail is that the Russians know they are being monitored by U.S. intelligence. One should assume by default that if the Russians say something over a communications stream that isn't hard for the U.S. to spy on, they wanted the U.S. to hear it. The authors point this out:


	Russia at times feeds false information into communication streams it suspects are monitored as a way of sowing misinformation and confusion among U.S. analysts. But officials said that it’s unclear what Kislyak would have had to gain by falsely characterizing his contacts with Kushner to Moscow, particularly at a time when the Kremlin still saw the prospect of dramatically improved relations with Trump.


Both of these statements can be true, but that does not at all imply that Kislyak was telling the truth, although the way the authors word this ("But officials said...") prompts the reader to think so.

Besides Kislyak, the author also cites an anonymous letter:


	The Post was first alerted in mid-December to the meeting by an anonymous letter, which said, among other things, that Kushner had talked to Kislyak about setting up the communications channel. This week, officials who reviewed the letter and spoke on the condition of anonymity to discuss sensitive intelligence said the portion about the secret channel was consistent with their understanding of events.


Again, this can be misleading: the authors say part of the anonymous letter was "consistent with the understanding of events" with officials, but do not say if the officials confirmed that a secret channel was discussed or not. Actually, according to the article, the officials said the meeting wasn't under surveillance:

	Neither the meeting nor the communications of Americans involved were under U.S. surveillance, officials said.


There is no reason to believe that any of these statements are false on their face. But the basic facts of the story are this: an anonymous letter to the authors said Jared Kushner wants to set-up a back-channel, and officials said Kislyak said Kushner wanted to set up a back-channel in a weird way. By these facts, there aren't any strong reasons at this point to believe or disbelieve Kushner wanted to set up a secret back-channel one way or another. But the way the article is worded, the authors would have you believe its a certainty.

Whether the authors are Russian propagandists or not, I believe this is a good example for explaining how Russian propaganda usually works, especially the layers of alibis and plausible deniability. The authors convinced much of the world that Kislyak definitely asked to set-up a secure channel in the Russian embassy, but if that turns out to be wrong, they can claim that they were convinced by their sources and (technically) didn't say anything false. Likewise, the officials who reported the intercepted communications can claim that they were merely reporting what Kislyak said. And one could imagine Kislyak himself would just brush it off (e.g. "Why do I get blamed for everything!", "The CIA did it.", or "I'm Russian, what did you expect?").

In general, active measures are "designed to be deniable:"


https://www.dni.gov/files/documents/ICA_2017_01.pdf
	By their nature, Russian influence campaigns are multifaceted and designed to be deniable because they use a mix of agents of influence, cutouts, front organizations, and false-flag operations. Moscow demonstrated this during the Ukraine crisis in 2014, when Russia deployed forces and advisers to eastern Ukraine and denied it publicly.


From another angle, their influence campaigns are designed ahead of time in such a way that the damage to their assets is limited should the campaign be discovered. For example, if undeniable proof came out that Putin ordered the story about Trump revealing classified information to be promoted in American media (perhaps as a way to discredit McMaster and the media), people would suspect Tom Bossert (who reportedly called Pompeo and Rogers to "contain the fallout") of being a Russian spy. But Bossert has already established himself as a windbag who doesn't know what he's doing--a plausible alternative explanation for his actions.

Knowing this gives a handy way to guess whether or not a specific claim in the media is true. To answer "to what degree should I believe this?", ask yourself "how easy would it be to lie about this?" It would be very risky, for example, to make up a claim that Trump disclosed a classified name of a city to the Russians--there are transcripts and first-hand accounts of the conversation. But it is much easier to spin this as a major security breach--most people can't judge what constitutes a national security breach, and the context of the disclosure is necessarily murky since it involves classified information.

This is another reason for journalists and the public to take heart: Russian propagandists can lie, but we can do a pretty decent job of figuring out who they are and what lies they're telling.

It's worth mentioning that one thing that's easy to lie about in general is a person's intent. For example, Maggie Haberman and Glenn Thrush say here that Trump intended to "get rid of" Flynn:


www.seattletimes.com/nation-world/analysis-pence-filling-key-voids-in-trump-white-house/
	By Glenn Thrush and Maggie Haberman
	The New York Times

	...When Flynn was fired in mid-February, Trump and White House officials said that he had misled the vice president about his conversations with Kislyak, which led to an embarrassing television appearance in which an oblivious Pence defended Flynn’s conduct.

	In reality, Trump — convinced by Bannon, Priebus and Kushner — had already decided that Flynn was a liability, and was eager to find an excuse to get rid of him, according to three administration officials familiar with the episode.


But this isn't consistent with the testimony of Yates (https://pastebin.com/YrPgkGCR) and the facts surrounding Flynn's ousting. Still, intent is hard to prove or disprove, so Thrush and Haberman have a reasonable alibi if they are called liars for reporting this. You can see the same pattern of assigning intent when they accuse McMaster of conspiring to cover for Trump:


https://www.nytimes.com/2017/05/16/us/white-house-staff.html
    By GLENN THRUSH and MAGGIE HABERMAN  MAY 16, 2017
 
    ...As they struggled to limit the fallout on Monday, Mr. Spicer and other Trump aides decided to send Lt. Gen. H. R. McMaster, the national security adviser, to serve as a surrogate.
 
    They realized that selecting such a high-ranking official would in some ways validate the story, but they wanted to establish a credible witness account exonerating the president from wrongdoing — before the barrage of Twitter posts they knew would be coming from Mr. Trump on Tuesday morning.
 
    The White House Counsel’s Office worked with the national security adviser, an Army general, on framing language, producing a clipped sound bite: “The story that came out tonight as reported is false.”
 
 
https://www.nytimes.com/2017/05/27/us/politics/trump-returns-to-crisis-over-kushner-as-white-house-tries-to-contain-it.html
    By MAGGIE HABERMAN, GLENN THRUSH and JULIE HIRSCHFELD DAVIS  MAY 27, 2017
 
    ...The reports about Mr. Kushner dominated an end-of-trip briefing for reporters in Taormina, Italy, where Lt. Gen. H. R. McMaster, the president’s national security adviser, and Gary D. Cohn, his top economic adviser, declined to comment specifically on Mr. Kushner but sought to play down the significance of the disclosures.
 
    “We have back-channel communications with any number of countries,” General McMaster said. “So, generally speaking, about back-channel communications, what that allows you to do is to communicate in a discreet manner. It doesn’t predispose you to any kind of content in that conversation.”
 
    He did not say whether he was comfortable with the idea of a private citizen, as Mr. Kushner was at the time, opening such a back channel.
 
    Behind the scenes, Mr. Trump’s advisers were working to create a crisis-control communications operation within the White House to separate the Russia investigations and related scandals from the administration’s day-to-day themes and the work of governing, according to several people familiar with their plans who spoke on the condition of anonymity because they were not authorized to divulge the details of a still-evolving strategy.


Maggie's insinuations don't fit with what's known about McMaster's character and the facts surrounding these incidents. Still, since we can't read McMaster's mind, such claims of intent are hard to completely prove or disprove. Accordingly, it's common for Russian propaganda to attack people or institutions by assigning malicious intent--if you're read them enough, by now you're probably familiar with Russian propaganda sites peddling theories of an evil "deep state" trying to "undermine" President Trump every time a negative story about him hits the press. If someone distrusts the mainstream media enough, just about anything they do can be spun to make them look bad by assigning intent:


https://medium.com/hci-design-at-uw/information-wars-a-window-into-the-alternative-media-ecosystem-a1347f32fd8f
	It’s important to note that not all of these domains contained content promoting alternative narratives of shooting events. In the Twitter conversations about these alternative narratives, domains were cited in different ways for different kinds of content.

	More than half of the domains in the graph (and more than 80% of the alternative media domains) were cited for content explicitly supporting the alternative narratives. However, others (especially mainstream media) were cited for factual accounts of the events, and then used as evidence by conspiracy theorists as they built these theories. And a few were referenced for their denials of these theories.

	...In the case of the New York Times, the newspaper posted an article explicitly denying alternative narratives of the Orlando shooting event. This denial was then cited several times by those promoting those narratives — as even more evidence for their theory. [This demonstrates a vexing aspect of rumor-correcting in this context — that corrections often backfire.]


The difference between seeing a correction or a cover-up is a difference in perception of intent. Trying to control these perceptions seems to be an easy and mostly risk-free way to influence public opinion.

Take the reporting by Haberman and associates on Pence, for example. As far as I can tell, Pence is a normal guy, well-liked, and a devout Christian with sensible policies:


http://freebeacon.com/national-security/governor-mike-pence-in-berlin-diplomacy-with-russia-has-failed/
	Governor Mike Pence In Berlin: Diplomacy with Russia Has Failed

	April 17, 2014 2:52 pm

	Gov. Mike Pence (R., Ind.) on Wednesday declared the "reset" of U.S.-Russian relations a failure and called for the construction of a European missile defense shield to deter Russian aggression.


But if you read Haberman, you get the impression that Pence is hatching some sort of "Game of Thrones"-style plot to grab power:


https://twitter.com/maggienyt/status/784799784733437953
	Pence statement essentially says Trump has chance to show "his heart" at debate tomorrow, appears to leave door open for himself.


https://www.nytimes.com/2016/07/17/us/politics/donald-trump-mike-pence.html
	A Grounded Plane and Anti-Clinton Passion: How Mike Pence Swayed the Trumps

	By ASHLEY PARKER, ALEXANDER BURNS and MAGGIE HABERMAN

	The families were chatting politely over coffee when Mr. Pence, a mild-mannered Midwesterner, delivered an uncharacteristically impassioned monologue, according to people with direct knowledge of his remarks, who spoke on the condition of anonymity about the meeting.

	With the vice presidency potentially hanging in the balance, Mr. Pence described his personal distaste for Hillary Clinton and her husband, the former president, and spoke of feeling disgusted at what he called the corruption of the 1990s.

	The monologue appeared to be a success.


https://twitter.com/maggieNYT/status/763789283043999744
	Via @AshleyRParker, Mike Pence wields a shovel and far-sightedness

	Mike Pence Campaigns With an Eye on His Own Future

	...behind the scenes, Mr. Pence and his team of loyalists are waging an equally challenging campaign, hoping to position him as a compelling national politician for a post-2016 landscape. Even if the Republican ticket fails in the battle for the White House, Mr. Pence wants to preserve his future viability, a goal that has created a delicate dance for him — leaving him wary of offending Mr. Trump and his base, while also eager to ingratiate himself with the Republican establishment.

	So far, Mr. Pence has performed this awkward two-step quite nimbly.

	...Mr. Pence and Mr. Trump were always an unlikely pairing — an ostentatious, thrice-married Manhattanite and a mild-mannered Midwestern governor, bound together more by mutual need and ambition than actual chemistry. 


https://twitter.com/maggienyt/status/830452474351931392
	Pence advisers unhappy that he is being dragged into muck on Flynn claim re Russia call


http://www.seattletimes.com/nation-world/analysis-pence-filling-key-voids-in-trump-white-house/
	Analysis: Pence filling key voids in Trump White House

	By Glenn Thrush and Maggie Haberman


https://twitter.com/maggienyt/status/797149864719249408
	PENCE taking over transition team, CHRISTIE stepping back >>


https://www.nytimes.com/2016/11/12/us/politics/trump-cabinet.html
	Vice President-Elect Pence to Take Over Trump Transition Effort

	By MICHAEL D. SHEAR, MAGGIE HABERMAN and MICHAEL S. SCHMIDT

	Vice President-elect Mike Pence will take over as the leader of Donald J. Trump’s transition effort, pushing aside Chris Christie, the governor of New Jersey, as Mr. Trump moves quickly to assemble a government after his stunning upset victory, the transition team said on Friday.


https://www.nytimes.com/2017/03/28/us/politics/vice-president-mike-pence.html
	Amid White House Tumult, Pence Offers Trump a Steady Hand

	By GLENN THRUSH and MAGGIE HABERMAN

	...Mr. Pence seems to have almost gone out of his way to avoid confrontation. On the November morning that New Jersey’s governor, Chris Christie, was ejected as the head of Mr. Trump’s transition team, he spent several oblivious hours on the 17th floor of Trump Tower with Mr. Pence, who would be tapped to replace him a few hours later.

	If Mr. Trump’s running mate knew what was about to hit, he didn’t share it, according to three people involved in the transition. That task fell to Mr. Bannon, who curtly dismissed Mr. Christie a few minutes after Mr. Pence took his leave.

	It’s clear that Mr. Pence knew Mr. Christie was in trouble — but it’s still unclear if he knew the ax would fall that day. Yet Mr. Pence’s dad-in-the-Norman Rockwell-painting demeanor masks a shrewd political intelligence, and he is often willing to play whatever role is required of him.


https://twitter.com/maggienyt/status/862324418789376001
	Pence played a key role in this with Trump yesterday, per two ppl close to discussions

		WASHINGTON (AP) — Vice President Mike Pence says Trump "made the right decision at the right time" in firing FBI Director Comey.


https://twitter.com/maggienyt/status/846894944195264514
	In reality, Bannon/Kushner/others had already decided they wanted to get rid of Flynn and Pence gave them cover


https://twitter.com/maggienyt/status/846894034094206976
	"There’s going to come a time when the Trump storm is over, and you have spent all this time defending him..."


http://www.npr.org/templates/transcript/transcript.php?storyId=524873266
	HABERMAN: ...But Pence very quickly melded himself into being a Trump person. Pence has long harbored national ambitions of his own and has always seemed not quite able to get there. And so for Pence's advisers, when he signed on with Trump - and to be clear, this was well before the "Access Hollywood" tape that you were referring to - they took this as a high risk, high reward gamble. 

 	...Pence is, for lack of a better - I don't want to say malleable because that suggests a lack of core beliefs in a way that I don't mean it, but I do think that Pence, for somebody who is a pretty dyed-in-the-wool conservative, can be willing to take a seemingly contrary stance when it suits him. I think for Trump, it's, frankly, less of a contradiction. 


There's a simple motive for Pence that Maggie missed: he knows the Russians are trying to influence Trump and he's trying to be a voice of reason. With the firing of Flynn and hiring of McMaster, it looks like that's exactly what he's been doing (see http://www.cnn.com/2017/02/20/politics/mike-pence-michael-flynn-comments/, http://abcnews.go.com/Politics/trump-names-lt-gen-hr-mcmaster-national-security/story?id=45617774, and http://wtop.com/dc/2017/02/trump-pick-as-security-adviser-is-independent-minded/). Instead, Haberman insists that Trump, Bannon and Kushner were "eager to find an excuse" to oust Flynn, somehow missed the dire warning from Yates, and waited 18 days and several embarrassing media reports later to finally fire him while Pence "gave them cover."

There are enough anomalies with Haberman's reporting to say with fair confidence, for the author at least, that she's one of the Russian propagandists. Corroborating this, access to Trump is decided by close Trump advisor Hope Hicks, who appears to favor Haberman:


http://www.cosmopolitan.com/politics/news/a56404/who-is-hope-hicks-trump-press-secretary/
	During the campaign, she reportedly received upward of 250 requests to speak with Trump per day, but "she alone decides who gets in and who's kept out," Olivia Nuzzi wrote for GQ. Occasionally, Hicks will accommodate Trump "tantrums" where he declares a certain reporter must be banned for a while.


http://www.gq.com/story/hope-hicks-mystifying-triumph-donald-trump
	None of this has earned her many enemies, however. Like Ivanka, Hicks has managed to float above it all. For now. “I have always found Hope to be great to deal with,” Maggie Haberman of The New York Times told me, “especially given the volume of requests she must be getting.”


http://www.marieclaire.com/politics/news/a20905/donald-trump-communications-director-hope-hicks/
	HH: In 2015, we were headquartered in New York City in Trump Tower. While we were there, we'd facilitate dozens of interview requests on a given day. He'll talk to anybody; he'll answer anything.


When Haberman was confronted about this, she became defensive:


http://www.npr.org/templates/transcript/transcript.php?storyId=524873266
	GROSS: This is FRESH AIR. I'm Terry Gross, back with New York Times White House correspondent Maggie Haberman. Before covering President Trump, she covered Trump's presidential campaign. She also interviewed him and wrote about him in the early 2000s when she was a reporter with the New York Post and the New York Daily News.

	Trump has said some very insulting things about you on Twitter, calling you sad and third rate and, you know, criticizing you for just being wrong. And yet, he calls you and he gives you scoops. I mean, he called you right before deciding to pull the plug on repeal and replace of Obamacare to give you a heads up about that. You know, you've interviewed him a bunch of times. It seems very contradictory that he'd be so publicly critical of you and then seek you out in the way that he does.

	HABERMAN: I mean, look. There's a - the person who I think is most similar to Trump in terms of how he approaches the media, honestly, is Chuck Schumer. And both of them come out of this New York City tabloid media market milieu. So they sort of understand the high and enjoy the high of getting a good story and have made an art form out of trying to find one. You know, Trump talks to me, I think, 'cause he believes it's advantageous for him sometimes. I also think that - he's known me a long time. And I think it's - I wouldn't underestimate the degree to which the familiar is something that's really important to him, going back to my earlier point about being a homebody.

	That said, you know, he perceives all slights as the same. And they're all of the same scale or all - anything that he perceives as a slight is definitely a slight. It's not debatable as to whether it's just a difference of opinion or whether you can just be debating a fact or, I mean, this is what he does. And he's very good at kind of summoning and harnessing outrage against people. Look. If I didn't work at The New York Times - I mean, I'm just being honest - if I didn't work at The New York Times, I'm not sure that I would be hearing from him when asked.

	And to be clear, when I spoke to him the day of the AHCA legislation being yanked, I had asked earlier in the day to speak to him that afternoon. I didn't know they were going to pull the bill at that point but I had asked to talk to him. When I have spoken to him, it's because I have asked for these interviews. I asked to talk to him for a story about how he was adjusting to White House life.

	But the Times - The New York Times holds a huge place of fascination for Trump. And it's something that I think his base, frankly, really struggles with the reality of. I think certainly, like, the folks at Breitbart struggle with that reality. But Trump is a Queens guy who always feels like people aren't giving him his proper respect. And getting proper respect from the Times has played an enormous role in his psychic life.

	And so I think that - I think that's a piece of this. Don't forget that one of the first real interviews he did right after he won was he came to The New York Times and did an on-the-record interview with us and with members of the editorial board but also reporters, with our publisher, with our executive editor. We didn't go to him. He came to us. And it's just an important thing to remember.


To get a sense of how Russian influence operations work, it helps to analyze what their known agents of influence say. There's even greater confidence that I.F. Stone was a Russian agent, since NSA intercepts and KGB defectors have pinned him as a spy, in addition to circumstantial evidence (https://pastebin.com/ar4GWrRT).

Stone, like other propagandists, has a way of planting ideas in his readers' heads without technically saying anything false:


http://www.ifstone.org/collectedifstone.pdf
	Organization for Peace . . . Or Against the Soviet Union?

	...That tendency, which is very strong, if not dominant, in the American delegation, is to regard the United Nations Conference on International Organization as a conference for the organization of an anti-Soviet bloc.

	This is not my own opinion alone. It is the opinion privately held by some of the most astute newspapermen here, irrespective of their own political orientation. In my own case, this opinion is the net product of my own estimate of the basic forces at work, of conference gossip, and of an attempt to find some pattern into which all the diverse pieces will fit.

	But I did not set this down on paper until I found confirmation in trustworthy official American quarters I may not here identify. I can only say that among the younger and more progressive men attached to the American delegation there is increasing apprehension over the extent to which the conference begins to take on the aspects of an attempt by our delegation to build an anti-Soviet world coalition.


The American delegation wanted to oppose the Soviets, but by choosing his words Stone makes it sound like some kind of dark conspiracy that should horrify you (e.g. "I did not set this down on paper until I found confirmation in trustworthy official American quarters I may not here identify"--as if Stone's information on anti-Soviet sentiment is so secret that his sources would be in danger if revealed). For anyone with a familiarity of the events of World War I and World War II (see https://pastebin.com/4x9uvu8Q and https://pastebin.com/e4qCs1AT), *not* opposing the Soviets would have been the real cause for concern.

In the same essay, Stone illustrates another fairly common technique of deception without outright lying: making a comment on a situation that is technically true but otherwise irrelevant:


http://www.ifstone.org/collectedifstone.pdf
	...The maintenance of the unity of the powers as a first essential of world peace is a principle to which everyone agrees. But whenever one sets out to explore some specific problem, the future of Germany, the fate of the Rhineland and Ruhr, the course of the Far Eastern war and the settlement which will emerge from it, one finds this principle forgotten.
	
	One finds, instead, that the main question in the minds of many State, War, and Navy Department officials, and too many members of the American delegation, is the balance of forces between the USA and the USSR, an implied assumption that war between them is inevitable and that it is our job to maneuver for as strong a position as possible in anticipation of that conflict.

	This dangerous belief that war between the two remaining great powers of the earth, the USA and the USSR, is inevitable—a belief which can make it so—has diverse roots.

	The defeat of Germany has upset the world balance of power. The strength of the Soviet Union has both surprised and frightened many leading figures in the War and Navy Departments; the bureaucracy of both tends to be either politically naive or socially reactionary.


It's true that peace and cooperation are desirable, and believing that war is inevitable can be a self-fulfilling prophecy. But that's not a helpful observation when, at least in the Russians' view, we are already at war:


https://www.shape.nato.int/systems/file_download.ashx?pg=15610&ver=2
	In an interview with Alfred Werner in the late 1940s, Albert Einstein famously forecast that World War IV would be fought with sticks and stones, implying that WW III would be so devastating given the development of nuclear weapons that the world would be destroyed as we know it should it be fought, with society returned to the Stone Age. Indeed it has been the objective of the world’s most powerful nations to avoid WW III through both peaceful measures and the development of standing alliances that dissuade would-be protractors from instigating hostilities against fellow members of the alliance.

	...Article 5 would have to be a major planning consideration for any nation contemplating hostile actions against any party to the North Atlantic Treaty, and indeed has helped ensure the peace held true throughout the Cold War, but how well it can secure the peace in the 21 st century remains to be seen given the latest Russian warfare mechanism specifically designed to evade the NATO Article 5 clause.

	...In General Gerasimov’s 2013 article, he stressed the importance of nonmilitary measures over military measures in order to achieve strategic or political goals, noting that nonmilitary measures were more effective than the military measures in the current operating environment, and thus specified these nonmilitary measures should actually out-number military measures by a ratio of 4:1. Gerasimov clarified, “The important point is that while the West considers these nonmilitary measures as ways of avoiding war, Russia considers these measures as war.”


And now Russia has rigged our election--a clear act of war. The people who held what Stone called a "dangerous belief" have been proven right. And this is another tactic you can see often in Russian propaganda: attacking as "dangerous" or "misguided" a perfectly reasonable idea that happens to disfavor the Kremlin. Stone's essay might also have had the effect of putting words in the mouth of people who opposed the Soviets at the time, creating a perception that they viewed war as "inevitable" when they might have just calculated war was likely or already here. In general, discrediting ideas that the Kremlin doesn't like and the people who hold them is common in Russian propaganda, and usually involves exaggerating their positions before ridiculing them.

Funnily enough, a lot of times they call ideas they don't like "propaganda:"


http://www.ifstone.org/collectedifstone.pdf
	As early as April 26, Walter Lippmann noted a tendency to assume “that because Germany is prostrate, the German problem is no longer the paramount problem of the world.” He found this reflected in “the fact that the main preoccupation of so many here has been not Germany, but the Soviet Union.” And he warned that our relations with the USSR would become hopeless “if we yield at all to those who, to say it flatly, are thinking of the international organization as a means of policing the Soviet Union.”

	I think it is no exaggeration to say that since last week, when Lippmann wrote what I have quoted, the anti-Soviet atmosphere has grown. It is no longer a question of not “yielding” to the men Lippmann has in mind. They are, if not running the show, at least playing the dominant part in the American delegation and in the conference.

	Some of them have been very open and very indiscreet in voicing their anti-Soviet views at the social functions in which celebrity-dazed San Francisco has been lionizing them. They have been equally open in spreading anti-Soviet propaganda “off the record” to correspondents who are their confidants or mouthpieces.


For an amusing example, the Russian propaganda site Zerohedge calls PropOrNot propaganda for calling Zerohedge Russian propaganda: http://www.zerohedge.com/news/2016-12-02/propaganda-about-russian-propaganda

Calling an idea "propaganda" is another way of assigning intent--the implication is that a nefarious and manipulative actor wants you to believe this idea, and so the idea is suspect (not to say this is always false, although it's not a very open-minded way to think in general).

That said, Stone also uses maybe the most famous hallmark of Russian propaganda, tu quoque (or "Whataboutism" https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Whataboutism):


http://www.ifstone.org/collectedifstone.pdf
	In an atmosphere of this kind one may be sure that the realistic Russians, who understand perfectly well what is going on, will make few concessions on Poland and other areas important to the security of the USSR. They are no more willing than are the French to rely for their security solely on a new world organization, especially one born in such circumstances.

	If this seems wicked of them, it may well be kept in mind that the United States Navy, on the question of international trusteeship, is equally unwilling to accept the new organization as a substitute for effective American control of the Pacific islands and perhaps some of the African territories where it considers bases necessary to our own security.


Stone implied that since the West opposed the Soviets and the U.S. held bases in the Pacific and Africa, the Soviets were justified in forcing their will on the Polish people. The Soviets killed thousands of Poles and went on to annex Poland (see https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Katyn_massacre and https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Western_betrayal#Yalta.2C_1945)--not at all comparable to what Stone faults the West for. But this is besides the point: annexing other countries and subjugating people is never justified, regardless of who's pointing this out. This would be just as true if Genghis Kahn said it. The mindset of tu quoque is "doing bad things is OK if other people do it too," which is false on its face.

In the author's opinion at least, the main damage from this kind of propaganda doesn't come from white-washing the misdeeds of the Soviets, but from introducing the tu quoque mindset to the American public, especially in politics. If Americans believe that one side of a debate or conflict violating standards of decency justifies the other side doing the same, the ultimate victim is decency itself:


http://money.cnn.com/2017/05/30/media/sean-hannity-rachel-maddow/
	May 30, 2017: 6:58 PM ET 

	 He added, "I want to be clear. It's not a boycott. They are just relaying information like [Media Matters]."

	Both Maloney and Hannity contended that Maddow was guilty of promoting conspiracy theories on her program over the years, but had not been subject to the same scrutiny that had been applied to Fox News hosts.

	"You don't have her facing fire," Maloney told CNN, saying Maddow makes "outlandish" claims on the air. "We want people held to the same standard." 


http://www.philly.com/philly/blogs/entertainment/television/Sean-Hannity-Seth-Rich-conspiracy-theory-USAA.html
	Sean Hannity resurrects DNC conspiracy theory, advertiser returns under pressure
	Updated: May 31, 2017

	Almost a week after saying he was dropping an investigation into the death of a former DNC staffer due to the pleas of his parents,  Sean Hannity resurrected the story on Tuesday night in the return to his Fox News show.


https://www.nytimes.com/2017/04/06/us/politics/neil-gorsuch-supreme-court-senate.html
	Senate Republicans on Thursday engineered a dramatic change in how the chamber confirms Supreme Court nominations, bypassing a Democratic blockade of Judge Neil M. Gorsuch in a move that will most likely reshape both the Senate and the court.

	After Democrats held together Thursday morning and filibustered President Trump’s nominee, Republicans voted to lower the threshold for advancing Supreme Court nominations from 60 votes to a simple majority.

	...Republicans argued that changing the rules to push through the nomination was their only option, accusing Democrats of razing Senate norms with the first-ever successful partisan filibuster of a Supreme Court nominee. Allowing this obstruction to stand, Republicans said, would have caused more damage than overriding Senate precedent to turn back the filibuster.

	“This is the latest escalation in the left’s never-ending judicial war, the most audacious yet,” Mr. McConnell said, after describing Democratic opposition in the past to Judge Robert H. Bork and Justice Clarence Thomas. “And it cannot and it will not stand. There cannot be two sets of standards: one for the nominees of the Democratic president and another for the nominees of Republican presidents.”

	...Senator Benjamin L. Cardin, Democrat of Maryland, said he was now serving an institution in “suffering,” with no clear direction as the parties lurched toward a deeper mutual resentment.

	“Where we go from here, it’s hard to tell,” he said. “Will there be further erosions or not?”

	He was asked if this might prove a turning point, a moment for doubling back. “We’re pretty early in this Congress,” he said. “So there’s plenty more time for more harm to be done.”

	Despair was bipartisan.

	...“There is such a profound lack of trust between the two parties,” said Ms. Collins, the rare Republican last year who supported holding a hearing and a vote on Judge Garland. “It’s hard to know whether the polarization in the Senate reflects the country or whether the polarization and divisiveness in the Senate affects the country.”

	She paused for a beat, a few feet from Mr. McConnell’s office.

	“Well, it clearly affects the country,” she said. “But which causes the other is at times hard to discern.”


This could have disastrous consequences for our country already. If it's true that the erosion of the filibuster allowed the Trump administration to install a Russian spy in the Supreme Court (not as far-fetched as it sounds; see: https://pastebin.com/QQCqNxuu), this could end up a deciding factor in two critical upcoming SCOTUS cases:


https://www.nytimes.com/2017/06/02/us/politics/trump-travel-ban-supreme-court.html
	Trump Administration Asks Supreme Court to Revive Travel Ban


http://www.chicagotribune.com/news/opinion/editorials/ct-gerrymander-supreme-court-wisconsin-edit-0528-jm-20170527-story.html
	Gerrymandering heads to the U.S. Supreme Court. Will Madigan map-making survive?


The Constitutionality of Trump's travel-ban is an important part of what looks like the strongest case for Trump's impeachment (abuse of power potential obstruction of justice; see https://pastebin.com/YrPgkGCR), and gerrymandering is a major roadblock for American voters who want to peacefully remove Congressmen that refuse to impeach Trump.

This illustrates another important point about Russian influence operations--it's not just planting ideas that benefit the Kremlin in people's heads (e.g. "annexing Poland is justified"), a lot of it is changing people's values in ways that make it easier for Russian agents to attack them or or easier to coax the people into attacking themselves. It's easier to place agents of influence among journalists who don't value honesty, easier to install spies in a Government that values winning partisan fights over the welfare of the country, and it's easier to get away with political influence operations in a country that allows super-PACs to do the same.

This is why its so important for the American people to fight back--the more we let them know that in America, a media that tells the truth is more important than a media that tells you what you want to hear, country comes above party, and democracy is for the people and not the highest bidder, the less these agents of influence can get away with. Defense of our values is defense of our country.

In the long term, this is what we've been doing, and we've been winning. In the 60's, the KGB thought they could use terrorist attacks and propaganda to spark a race war in America (https://medium.com/@bb06/ideological-subversion-and-racism-f3d09421cf78t); you'd be hard-pressed to find someone who thinks a plot like that could ever work today.

In the short term, its probably a good idea to figure out what Russians intend to do with Trump. Intent is hard to prove, but we can do our best to guess.

Pence and McMaster have cleaned up some of the mess Russia made with the NSC, and it looks like both have tried to counter their influence over Trump. As for how Russia tries to influence Trump, we can learn from history:. Mao Zedong was installed by the Soviets as dictator of China; like Trump, Mao was both arrogant and not very bright:


https://pastebin.com/e4qCs1AT


https://www.cia.gov/library/readingroom/docs/CIA-RDP85T00153R000300020014-2.pdf
    There is a term in party jargon coined by Lenin himself: 'a useful idiot.'
 
 
http://bookfi.net/dl/1026321/4847c5
    ...he was deterred by having to learn Russian. He made a stab at it, taking lessons from a Russian emigre (and agent), Sergei Polevoy But according to Polevoy the other students teased Mao when he could not even master the alphabet, and he left in a huff Unlike many of his radical contemporaries, including most of the future Chinese Communist leaders, Mao went to neither France nor Russia.
 
 
https://en.wikiquote.org/wiki/Mao_Zedong#Quotes
    The chaos caused was on a grand scale and I take responsibility. Comrades, you must all analyse your own responsibility. If you have to shit, shit! If you have to fart, fart! You will feel much better for it.
    --Speech At The Lushan Conference (23 July 1959)
 
 
    Maybe you're afraid of sinking. Don't think about it. If you don't think about it, you won't sink. If you do, you will.
    --Swimming advice to physician Zhisui Li (1966), quoted in The TIME 100 (13 April 1998)
 
 
    [Mao] has played politics with Asian cunning. … [and] has always been a master at concealing his true intention. … I was always on my guard with him.
    --Nikita Khrushchev, as quoted in A. Doak Barnett (1977) China and the major powers in East Asia, page 352
 
 
https://www.thevintagenews.com/2016/09/26/1958-mao-zedong-ordered-sparrows-killed-ate-much-grain-caused-one-worst-environmental-disasters-history/
    In 1958 Mao Zedong ordered all the sparrows to be killed because they ate too much grain. This caused one of the worst environmental disasters in history
 
 
http://bookfi.net/dl/1026321/4847c5
    As conscience always implies some concern for other people, and is not a corollary of hedonism, Mao was rejecting the concept. His view was: "I do not think these [commands like 'do not kill,' 'do not steal' and 'do not slander'] have to do with conscience. I think they are only out of self-interest for self-preservation." All considerations must "be purely calculation for oneself and absolutely not for obeying external ethical codes, or for so-called feelings of responsibility. . ."
 
    ...These attributes he held to be reserved for "Great Heroes"--a group to which he appointed himself For this elite, he said:
 
    Everything outside their nature, such as restrictions and constraints, must be swept away by the great strength in their nature . . . When Great Heroes give full play to their impulses, they are magnificently powerful, stormy and invincible. Their power is like a hurricane arising from a deep gorge, and like a sex-maniac on heat and prowling for a lover. . . there is no way to stop them.
 

https://www.cia.gov/library/readingroom/docs/esau-35.pdf
    Central Intelligence Agency
    Intelligence Report
 
    ...Mao's arrogance has continued to create friction.
 
    ...Mao supremely arrogant, rejected minor CPSU concessions, demanded CPSU self-humiliation.
 

https://www.marxists.org/reference/archive/mao/selected-works/volume-9/mswv9_01.htm
    WHERE DO CORRECT IDEAS COME FROM?
 
    This passage is from the “Draft Decision of the Central Committee of the Chinese Communist Party on Certain Problems in Our Present Rural Work”, which was drawn up under the direction of Comrade Mao Tse-tung. The passage was written by Comrade Mao Tse-tung himself
 
    ...Countless phenomena of the objective external world are reflected in a man’s brain through his five sense organs  —  the organs of sight, hearing, smell, taste and touch. At first, knowledge is perceptual. The leap to conceptual knowledge, i.e., to ideas, occurs when sufficient perceptual knowledge is accumulated. This is one process in cognition. It is the first stage in the whole process of cognition, the stage leading from objective matter to subjective consciousness from existence to ideas. Whether or not one’s consciousness or ideas (including theories, policies, plans or measures) do correctly reflect the laws of the objective external world is not yet proved at this stage....
 

But it looks like the Okhrana did have agents who went out of their way to get very close to Mao, like Lin Bao (who later tried to flee to the Soviet Union):

 
https://www.cia.gov/library/readingroom/docs/DOC_0000283487.pdf
    Central Intelligence Agency
    Intelligence Report
    Lin Piao and the Great Helmsman
 
    Lin's own definition of his relationship with Mao is so extreme that it has sometimes been regarded as a hoax, a cynical exploitation of the old man's insatiable vanity. For more than 25 years Lin has been upholding Mao's "thought" and urging absolute faith in Mao, and in recent years he has praised Mao--in terms reminiscent of Stalin's sycophants--as always correct, the greatest of all Communists, the supreme genius, the source of all light, the answer to every problem.
 
    ...Lin Piao apparently took Mao Tse-tung as his man from the moment of meeting him in 1928. ...Lin is said to have agreed with Mao in those years on the principle of party domination of the military and to have stood with Mao against other elements of the party and military leadership who questioned Mao's policies. Early in the Long March of 1934-35, Lin was among Mao's supporters in the showdown with other party leaders which established Mao as the dominant figure
 
    ...Early in 1960 Lin instructed the PLA to memorize the most important passages in Mao's works, "even though you do not understand them." (Lin was later, during the Cultural Revolution, to issue a similar order with respect to Mao's directives.)


Mao trusted Lin (at first), and Lin would give Mao stupid ideas that happened to hurt both the U.S. and China:

 
https://www.cia.gov/library/readingroom/docs/DOC_0000283487.pdf
    ...Inter alia, Lin endorsed the "paper tiger" concept--that the West would be afraid to use its nuclear weapons and therefore could be aggressively opposed
 
     
Lin was instrumental in "interpreting" Mao's "thought" during the cultural revolution, for example, which ended with the deaths of hundreds of thousands of Chinese and did lasting damage to Chinese society. And Tan Zhenlin, another suspicious character among Mao's advisors, tried to convince Mao everything was fine while millions of Chinese were starving to death due to his policies:


https://books.google.com/books?id=9pPxwn6EvR4C&pg=PA142
	By winter 1958, some mess halls in the communes had run out of food, leading to outward migration oedema, and abnormal deaths. Peasants were fleeing, begging, and battling for food. By early 1958, spring famine had already occurred

	...Mao thought that the food shortage problem was restricted to only a few provinces, and transfers from the centre or from other provinces would take care of the problem.

	...At the initial stage of communization in early September, Tan Zhenlin reassured Mao with a rosy report that claimed that communes had been formed rapidly and smoothly, and that only in a minority of places had the peasants resorted to slaughtering and selling of livestock, felling trees, and grain concealment.


https://books.google.com/books?id=NrOKDQAAQBAJ&pg=PA490
	They were urged to eat their fill as China would soon by overflowing with food. Minister of Agriculture Tan Zhenlin asked, 'After all, what does Communism mean? ...First, taking good food and not merely eating one's fill. At each meal one enjoys a meat diet, eating chicken, pork, fish, eggs.'


Apparently Mao, arrogant as he was, was eager to believe his policies were "rosy" and not killing tens of millions of his own people.

Reportedly, the same kind of game is being played among Trump's advisors in the White House today:


http://www.politico.com/story/2017/05/15/donald-trump-fake-news-238379
	White House chief of staff Reince Priebus issued a stern warning at a recent senior staff meeting: Quit trying to secretly slip stuff to President Donald Trump.

	Just days earlier, K.T. McFarland, the deputy national security adviser, had given Trump a printout of two Time magazine covers. One, supposedly from the 1970s, warned of a coming ice age; the other, from 2008, about surviving global warming, according to four White House officials familiar with the matter.

	Trump quickly got lathered up about the media’s hypocrisy. But there was a problem. The 1970s cover was fake, part of an internet hoax that’s circulated for years. Staff chased down the truth and intervened before Trump tweeted or talked publicly about it.


http://www.politico.com/story/2017/04/donald-trump-bashar-assad-syria-chemical-weapons-237083
    In White House meetings, evening calls with friends and even throughout the weekend at Mar-a-Lago, President Donald Trump asked a repeated question: Why did Syria’s president use nerve gas? Trump puzzled over the mystery —even as he ordered 59 Tomahawk missiles careening into a Syrian airfield last Thursday night.
 
    Trump isn’t alone. U.S. officials and Syria experts are still debating what Syrian President Bashar Assad was thinking when he ordered a chemical attack sure to spark international outrage. Maybe Assad was hoping to terrorize his opponents. Perhaps he was testing Trump’s limits for his military planning. Trump officials even initially considered the possibility that Assad had not ordered the strike at all, according to one administration official, and that a military commander might have gone rogue without Assad’s knowledge.
 
    …Trump is hardly the only one wondering about Assad's motive. “It’s a good question,” said Paul Salem, a Syria expert at the Middle East Institute. “Nobody really knows.”
 
    While many Syria experts in Washington endorse the official consensus that Assad is desperate to fend off even a weakened rebel opposition, they are still entertaining other theories.
 
    Some are complex and probably far-fetched. They include the possibility of a rogue military commander — perhaps loyal to Iran, which has sent troops and funding to prop up Assad — was trying to sabotage the possibility of a U.S.-Russia-Assad alliance that could isolate Tehran.


And there is every sign that Trump is just as arrogant and unstable as Mao, if not more so:


http://www.hollywoodreporter.com/news/donald-trump-angled-soviet-posting-1980s-says-nobel-prize-winner-1006312
	"He said to me, 'I hear you met with Gorbachev, and you had a long interview with him, and you're a doctor, so you have a good assessment of who he is,'" Lown recalls. "So I asked, 'Why would you want to know?' And he responded, 'I intend to call my good friend Ronnie,' meaning Reagan, 'to make me a plenipotentiary ambassador for the United States with Gorbachev.' Those are the words he used. And he said he would go to Moscow and he'd sit down with Gorbachev, and then he took his thumb and he hit the desk and he said, 'And within one hour the Cold War would be over!' I sat there dumbfounded. 'Who is this self-inflated individual? Is he sane or what?'"

http://www.slate.com/articles/news_and_politics/the_spectator/2016/03/trump_s_nuclear_experience_advice_for_reagan_in_1987.html
	“It’s a total skill and art. See—again, I don’t want to say I have it. I don’t want to come off saying that. I’m just talking about some people. Some people have an innate skill. There’s an ability to make deals. I mean I’ve gone into meetings when I’ve seen my people who are highly paid, very bright, they went to Harvard, they say the deal is dead. I’ll go in and make the deal. Not only will I make the deal but I’ll make it better than they could have.


https://twitter.com/realdonaldtrump/status/527388136306143232
	Just out - the POLAR ICE CAPS are at an all time high, the POLAR BEAR population has never been stronger. Where the hell is global warming?


http://www.slate.com/articles/news_and_politics/the_spectator/2016/03/trump_s_nuclear_experience_advice_for_reagan_in_1987.html
	...“I don’t think I have to be the one. I’m not saying this to promote myself. But it has to be somebody of only a few people. Somebody who has the ability to make a deal. Because there’s a deal there to be done absolutely. But not by the present players,” he says, referring to current American negotiators and Reagan negotiators.

	...It’s a deal with the Soviets. We approach them on this basis: We both recognize the nonproliferation treaty’s not working, that half a dozen countries are on the brink of getting a bomb. Which can only cause trouble for the two of us. The deterrence of mutual assured destruction that prevents the United States and the USSR from nuking each other won’t work on the level of an India-Pakistan nuclear exchange. Or a madman dictator with a briefcase-bomb team. The only answer is for the Big Two to make a deal now to step in and prevent the next generation of nations about to go nuclear from doing so. By whatever means necessary.

	“Most of those [pre-nuclear] countries are in one form or another dominated by the U.S. and the Soviet Union,” Trump says. “Between those two nations you have the power to dominate any of those countries. So we should use our power of economic retaliation and they use their powers of retaliation and between the two of us we will prevent the problem from happening.

	...You apply as much pressure as necessary until you achieve the goal. You start off telling them, ‘Let’s get rid of it.’ If that doesn’t work you then start cutting off aid. And more aid and then more. You do whatever is necessary so these people will have riots in the street, so they can’t get water. So they can’t get Band-Aids, so they can’t get food. Because that’s the only thing that’s going to do it—the people, the riots.”


All reports on Trump say the same things: he's arrogant, impressively dim, doesn't pay attention, doesn't have any real principles, and constantly changes his mind on major issues. Trump is an empty vessel for the thoughts of Russian spies. If one of his "advisors" tells him a conspiracy theory that Iran was behind the Syrian chemical attack, there is little we know about Trump to give us hope that he wouldn't declare war on Iran (other than that it might make him unpopular). 


Reportedly, the Russians intend to influence Trump through his advisors:


http://www.cnbc.com/2017/05/24/russians-reportedly-discussed-using-trumps-advisors-to-influence-him.html
	U.S. intelligence officials had information last year to suggest that Russian officials discussed the potential to "exert influence over" then-candidate Donald Trump through key advisors, The New York Times reported Wednesday, citing "three current and former American officials familiar with the intelligence."


One has to wonder why the Russians would bother with a crazy set-up like this for Mao and Trump. Why not just install a spy? We can only guess, but one possible answer is that they prefer to rely on "disposable" useful idiot when they plan on doing damage to the target country. With Mao, the Russians would have been able to predict that after the Great Famine and the Cultural Revolution there would be attempts on Mao's life--they'd have a hard time finding any of their own agents willing to take the risk. Hence the reliance on "useful idiots."

Interestingly, the Soviets ended up plotting to assassinate Mao themselves: https://www.cia.gov/library/readingroom/docs/DOC_0000253617.pdf It's hard to say for sure, but there are strong indications from the Lin Biao incident and other events that the Chinese managed to "gain control" of Mao before the Soviets could use him to do any more damage.

This is why its so important for people like Pence and McMaster to be there to be a "voice of reason" for Trump. There is, essentially, a battle for our country being fought over this one man's strange mind. This is probably often a very not-fun job for Pence, who has to balance not pissing-off Trump and not pissing-off the rest of the world:


https://www.independent.co.uk/news/world/americas/us-politics/mike-pence-climate-change-us-vice-president-paris-agreement-issue-left-for-some-reason-donald-trump-a7769081.html
	Vice President Mike Pence has called the issue of climate change "a paramount issue for the left" as he sought to defend Donald Trump's decision to withdraw the US from the Paris agreement on climate change.

	His comments came a day after Mr Trump announced he was pulling out of the global accord signed by nearly 200 countries in an effort to reduce greenhouse gas emissions and tackle global warming. 


https://www.commondreams.org/views/2016/09/13/existential-madness-putin-bashing
	The Existential Madness of Putin-Bashing


https://www.commondreams.org/views/2017/04/03/putin-derangement-syndrome-arrives
	Putin Derangement Syndrome Arrives

	Whatever the truth about Trump and Russia, the speculation surrounding it has become a dangerous case of mass hysteria


https://www.commondreams.org/newswire/2017/06/01/over-22000-urge-media-stop-ignoring-pences-culpability
	Over 22,000 Urge Media: 'Stop Ignoring Pence's Culpability'

	WASHINGTON -  More than 22,000 people have signed a petition urging major U.S. media to stop ignoring Mike Pence's culpability.

	The petition, found at RootsAction.org, reads:

	"Vice President Mike Pence has established a pattern of false statements, misdirection, and blind obedience to Donald Trump. It is time to aggressively scrutinize his statements and actions."


The Russians might be trying to create similar dilemmas for McMaster (https://pastebin.com/ar4GWrRT), although so far it looks like McMaster just answers questions straight and doesn't try to explain Trump's positions like Pence does.

Other than Pence and McMaster, it is unclear if there are any other pro-American influences on Trump. Every other Trump confidant is suspect. Some have pointed to his daughter Ivanka, but just because she was born in the United States doesn't mean she is loyal to the United States. Yeltsin was another useful idiot comparable to Trump, but his daughter didn't seem to have any problems betraying her country and used her father to grab power for herself:


http://articles.latimes.com/1996-07-09/news/mn-22423_1_boris-yeltsin
	A team of American political strategists who helped Gov. Pete Wilson with his abortive presidential bid earlier this year said this week that they served as Russian President Boris N. Yeltsin's secret campaign weapon in his comeback win over a Communist challenger.

	And while some Muscovites are debating whether the Americans saved Yeltsin's job or merely provided one voice among many working to revive the Russian president's political chances, the consultants have now emerged to give interviews about how they quietly peddled advice to Yeltsin's 36-year-old daughter and key advisor, Tatyana Dyachenko.


http://www.abc.net.au/news/2009-09-23/yeltsin-drunk-near-naked-outside-white-house/1438342
	Russian leader Boris Yeltsin was once found near the White House late at night dressed in his underwear, seemingly drunk and looking for pizza, according to a new book detailing Bill Clinton's presidency.


http://articles.latimes.com/1999/oct/10/news/mn-20957
	Yeltsin's Daughter Viewed as Power Behind Throne

	Today, the reclusive 39-year-old mathematician is widely viewed as the power behind the Kremlin throne. Officially, she is on the government payroll as the "image-maker" of her ailing father, President Boris N. Yeltsin. The part she plays, however, is much broader.

	Of all Yeltsin's aides and advisors, Dyachenko alone has unlimited access to him. She has an office in the Kremlin--and lives with the president at his country estate outside Moscow. In a nation where men have long dominated political life, she serves as the president's eyes and ears, and as an intermediary for top officials seeking presidential action. When Yeltsin is ill or tired--which is much of the time--she is said to act in his name.

	"She is the one who is running the country," said Vyacheslav A. Nikonov, a political consultant who worked with Dyachenko on Yeltsin's 1996 reelection campaign. "An amateur advisor to the president is running the country. She makes many decisions without consulting him."


This isn't to say Ivanka is definitely the "one who is running the country," but rather that in these kinds of operations, it's not always easy to know who has power and who can be trusted.

Some natural questions then are: who has the most influence over Trump? who do they work for? and what are they trying to get him to do?


For the questions of "who has influence?" and "who do they work for?", intercepts of Russian intelligence officials suggest they intended to use Flynn and Manafort to influence Trump:


https://www.nytimes.com/2017/05/24/us/politics/russia-trump-manafort-flynn.html
	WASHINGTON — American spies collected information last summer revealing that senior Russian intelligence and political officials were discussing how to exert influence over Donald J. Trump through his advisers, according to three current and former American officials familiar with the intelligence.

	The conversations focused on Paul Manafort, the Trump campaign chairman at the time, and Michael T. Flynn, a retired general who was advising Mr. Trump, the officials said. Both men had indirect ties to Russian officials, who appeared confident that each could be used to help shape Mr. Trump’s opinions on Russia.


But former DNI clapper and others have said the Russians sometimes let their communications be intercepted to confuse Western spies (or maybe confuse the public, since these stories keep getting leaked), so it's hard to know for sure if these two were supposed to be Russia's main conduits to Trump. Manafort, for one, isn't in the White House, and Flynn is unstable and doesn't look like a competent agent of influence (see http://www.reuters.com/article/us-flynn-national-security-commentary-idUSKBN15S28E and http://thehill.com/blogs/blog-briefing-room/news/287226-flynn-clarifies-abortion-comments-im-a-pro-life-democrat). Flynn fits the bill for another useful idiot, which makes sense considering he was originally supposed to be Trump's VP:


http://www.npr.org/templates/transcript/transcript.php?storyId=524873266
	HABERMAN: ...You know, he's a novice politician who needed help balancing the ticket, and he needed somebody who wasn't going to overshadow him. His two other true - three options at the time, one was Mike Flynn, who crashed and burned during a road test on a Sunday show with ABC - which was probably for the best Given everything we know now - one was Newt Gingrich and one was Chris Christie. And in both cases but particularly with Newt - and I enjoy covering Newt Gingrich a great deal - but one of the Trump advisers said to me at the time, if we pair them up, they will end up fighting with each other by the end of the campaign.


The Russians likely wanted this set-up since it would have meant impeaching Trump would just put another useful idiot in power.

Any important Russian conduit to Trump would both have Trump's trust and be a competent agent of influence. In the media, Steve Bannon, Jared Kushner, and Ivanka Trump are the mostly commonly named advisors close to Trump. All three are charismatic and seem to be able to play the media well. Ivanka and Kushner, in particular, have obviously known Trump for a long time and have his trust:


https://www.washingtonpost.com/politics/in-fathers-scandal-the-genesis-of-jared-kushners-unflinching-loyalty/2016/11/27/1e9497ba-b378-11e6-840f-e3ebab6bcdd3_story.html
	For Trump son-in-law and confidant Jared Kushner, a long history of fierce loyalty

	...Kushner would often sit with Trump on the president-elect’s private plane, a Boeing 757 outfitted with cream leather couches, gold seat buckles and a big-screen television. He would quietly turn to Trump as they both read between stops — Trump rifling through a pile of printed articles, Kushner on his laptop or phone. They’d keep an eye on Fox News Channel, with Kushner whispering tidbits of information and the latest about the family.


http://www.cnn.com/2017/03/29/politics/ivanka-trump-white-house-job/
	Ivanka Trump is making her White House job official


According to Trump, at least, Bannon doesn't enjoy the same level of trust with the President:


https://www.usatoday.com/story/news/politics/onpolitics/2017/04/12/president-trump-steve-bannon/100361644/
	“I like Steve, but you have to remember he was not involved in my campaign until very late,” Trump told New York Post columnist Michael Goodwin about the White House adviser. “I had already beaten all the senators and all the governors, and I didn’t know Steve. I’m my own strategist and it wasn’t like I was going to change strategies because I was facing crooked Hillary.”

	“Steve is a good guy, but I told them to straighten it out or I will," Trump said in the interview, referring to the alleged rift between Bannon and Jared Kushner, the president's son-in-law and senior adviser.


Trump seems to think of himself as some kind of mob boss, valuing "loyalty" from his subordinates and sometimes publicly humiliating them or putting them through weird tests:


http://www.rawstory.com/2017/03/white-house-loyalty-test-leaving-cabinet-agencies-unstaffed-and-trumps-secretaries-are-furious/
	The White House is frustrating cabinet secretaries by rejecting staffer candidates suspected of possible disloyalty to President Donald Trump.

	The Office of Personnel Management won’t approve the hiring of Hillary Clinton supporters, “Never Trump” conservatives or anyone whose politics lean left even for low-level positions, reported Axios.

	At least one cabinet official, Interior Secretary Ryan Zinke, has complained directly to the president about the hiring process and demanded the approval of his proposed staff.

	According to a source, Trump told Zinke his staffers would be approved “as long as they’re our people,” and the source added similar conversations have taken place with other cabinet secretaries.


http://www.newsweek.com/trump-mcmaster-israel-russia-fired-national-security-adviser-jared-kushner-616735
	Is H.R. McMaster, the White House national security adviser, on the way out? By some signs, he is: President Donald Trump not only excluded him from a key meeting with Israeli Prime Minister Benjamin Netanyahu and his national security adviser Monday night in Jerusalem, he was kept “outside the King David [Hotel] room during the course of the entire meeting,” according to an eye-catching Israeli account.


https://www.msn.com/en-us/money/markets/trump-dealt-with-a-series-of-people-who-had-mob-ties/ar-AAinc5y
	In 1981, a young and ambitious Donald Trump sat down with federal agents and discussed his calculation in entering the mob-infested world of Atlantic City casinos.

	He acknowledged it might tarnish the reputation his family built through traditional real-estate development in New York. He was aware a business partner in the New Jersey beach town knew people who might be unsavory. A Federal Bureau of Investigation agent advised Mr. Trump there were easier ways he could invest, said an FBI memo recounting the discussion.


http://www.mediaite.com/tv/donald-trump-blasts-michele-bachmann-for-bailing-on-debate-its-called-loyalty/
	Donald Trump phoned in to Don Imus‘ Fox Business Network show on Friday morning, and he lit into Michele Bachmann for her decision to skip his Dec. 27 debate.

	“You know who I’m very disappointed in? Michele Bachmann. She’s come up to see me four times. Four times. She’d call me, she’d ask me for advice, she said I should be her Vice Presidential… you know… if she wins, she’d like to think about me for the Vice Presidency, all of these things,” Trump said. “And then after all of that, she announced she’s not going to do the debate. It’s unbelievable. You know, it’s called loyalty. It’s actually called loyalty. How do you do that? You know, it’s amazing to me.” 


http://www.politico.com/blogs/2016-gop-primary-live-updates-and-results/2016/03/donald-trump-loyalty-oaths-220416
	Donald Trump dismissed comparisons of his use of loyalty oaths during recent campaign rallies to Nazi Germany and other dark chapters of history on Tuesday as "ridiculous."

	"I mean, we’re having such a great time," Trump told NBC's "Today" in a pre-primary telephone interview.

	The loyalty pledges began at a rally Saturday in Orlando, Florida, where Trump asked the crowd: “Raise your right hand: ‘I do solemnly swear that I — no matter how I feel, no matter what the conditions, if there’s hurricanes or whatever — will vote, on or before the 12th for Donald J. Trump for president."


To find who has real influence with Trump, a good place to look are the people he views as loyal who've known him for a long time. Trump's "original four" campaign staff are promising:


https://www.bloomberg.com/politics/articles/2016-11-11/trump-s-original-four-the-staffers-behind-his-historic-victory
	Only four of Donald Trump’s original inner circle of senior staff have survived all the turmoil, at Trump’s side from the earliest days when his ambitions for the White House were a constantly mocked long-shot, to his historic trip to the nation’s capital on Thursday.

	They were the staff who kept Trump buoyed amid the incessant drumbeat of predictions that he had no chance.

	“We lived it 24/7—and began with a one percent chance of winning the nomination,” Dan Scavino, the campaign’s social media strategist, said in an interview.

	Trump’s four constants: Scavino, who first met Trump as a teenage caddie at one of the billionaire businessman’s golf courses and rose to a senior position within the Trump Organization; communications director Hope Hicks, a fashion model-turned-press secretary who had never been involved in politics before her boss ran for president; Michael Glassner, deputy campaign manager and a former aide to former Senator Bob Dole and former vice presidential candidate Sarah Palin; and George Gigicos, Trump’s director of advance, who organized every single one of his rallies.

	“We have a very close bond,” Hicks said.


Scavino and Hicks are especially interesting:


	As a 16-year-old, Scavino had ambitions to work for Trump, and climbed his way up through the company to become a general manager.
 	
	...Hicks, 27, entered Trump’s orbit by working public relations for his daughter Ivanka Trump’s company. On the campaign trail, he didn’t go anywhere without Hicks, who handled media requests and offered counsel.

	...When Trump weighed who to take with him to Washington on Thursday to meet President Barack Obama and begin his transition to power, he tapped Scavino, Hicks, and Gigicos.

	“They understand him, and understand what he needs and wants. They’re his core advisers,” said Glassner, who stayed behind at campaign headquarters at Trump Tower in New York to handle some transition planning.

	...In the early days, the four went everywhere Trump went, strategizing on the fly as they jetted between the early states. Trump’s “motorcade” in those pre-Secret Service days consisted of a couple Suburbans rented from a car service—one with Trump in the front seat and Hicks and original campaign manager Corey Lewandowski in the back, and Scavino, Glassner, and head of security Keith Schiller in the second SUV.

	...Trump had called the original four onto the stage with him when he won New Hampshire, the victory that revived his prospects after a devastating loss in Iowa, and had gathered them around him at a press conference during the national convention. So it didn’t surprise them when he said: Family first on stage “and the rest of you, too.”


Both have known Trump for years before the campaign and are close to his family. Hicks and Scavino have acted like they wanted to get close to Trump:


http://fortune.com/2016/03/25/trump-scavino-mcconney-social-media/
	Dan Scavino has been the director of social media for the Trump campaign since July 2015, according to an email to Fortune from campaign spokesperson Hope Hicks. He is on the road and posts on social media from the campaign trail. A February 2016 campaign press release said Scavino had "managed the campaign’s social media efforts working directly with Mr. Trump" and described him as a "longtime Trump confidant."

	...In 2004 he rejoined the Trump National Golf Course as assistant manager, according to an interview with Hudson Valley Magazine. He worked his way up to executive vice president by 2008, according to a company press release. In the Hudson Valley interview, Scavino said he spoke with Trump daily and accompanied him "every other weekend" to Trump's Mar-a-Lago resort in Florida.


http://www.cnn.com/2016/04/29/politics/donald-trump-tweets-daniel-scavino/
	When Trump began to take a serious look at a White House bid in 2014, Scavino was about to launch a communication consulting business. At Eric Trump's wedding in November 2014, Scavino approached Trump and pledged to give up his own plans and join the cause.

	"I went up to Mr. Trump and told him I will drop everything I am doing to join you on the campaign trail," Scavino recalled, a promise he fulfilled the next year when he halted development of the website for his new business and hit the road.


https://ballotpedia.org/Hope_Hicks
	After graduating from Southern Methodist University in 2010, Hope Hicks began working for the public relations firm Zeno Group.[3] She then moved to Hiltzik Strategies in New York City. While at Hiltzik, according to The Washington Post, Hicks "began working on accounts related to Trump’s vast real estate, hospitality and fashion ventures." She then moved to the Trump Organization in 2014.[4] Matthew Hiltzik, head of the company, told the New York Post, "She understands the different personalities. Hope has a great work ethic and a constant willingness to learn and adjust — and the right temperament to roll with the punches."[2]

	Hicks began her work in the Trump Organization working with Trump's daughter, fashion designer Ivanka, until early 2015.[3] In addition to doing public relations work with Ivanka, Hicks has modeled her clothing.


https://ivankatrump.com/team-ivanka-street-style-hope/
	“In this outfit, I can jump on the shuttle to D.C. to do press for our upcoming hotel and come back to NYC in time for drinks with my boyfriend without having to change.” —Hope Hicks


http://www.gq.com/story/hope-hicks-mystifying-triumph-donald-trump
	Hicks grew close to Ivanka and began dressing like the heiress, who seemed worthy of the emulation. Ivanka was that rare female corporate leader who is also kind to other women, and she affected an air of competence that seemed to temper the boorishness of the Trump brand. Conveniently, as Hicks ingratiated herself to Ivanka, she won over The Donald as well—helped by the eager-to-please disposition she'd displayed since childhood.


Both have convinced Trump of their loyalty:


https://www.bloomberg.com/politics/articles/2016-11-11/trump-s-original-four-the-staffers-behind-his-historic-victory
	Scavino, a devout Catholic, is now so close to the Trumps that the campaign staff said they view him as more like a member of the family.


http://www.cnn.com/2016/04/29/politics/donald-trump-tweets-daniel-scavino/
	Scavino talks about Trump like a devoted son defends the legacy of a father. As a confidant to a presidential frontrunner, a role that comes with intense media scrutiny and long list of challenges, the job has taken Scavino on an emotional roller coaster as he's watched people call his beloved boss names like, "racist," a "sniveling coward" and a "loser."

	"I take it personal sometimes," Scavino said, a sentiment that comes across on his personal social media accounts, which contain passionate defenses of the Trump brand. "He doesn't deserve a lot of this crap that's being said about him. ... It fires me up. It pisses me off, it really does, because I care about the man and I care about his family." 

	...When asked if there's anything Trump could say or do that would cause Scavino to leave, he replied, "No." 


https://www.nytimes.com/2016/06/26/style/hope-hicks-donald-trump.html
	He seems to appreciate it. “I’m lucky to have her,” Mr. Trump said in a telephone interview on Thursday. “She’s got very good judgment. She will often give advice, and she’ll do it in a very low-key manner, so it doesn’t necessarily come in the form of advice. But it’s delivered very nicely.”

	...“Her most important role is her bond with the candidate,” said Paul Manafort, the veteran Republican adviser who, as of this past week, had been put in charge of the campaign. “She totally understands him.”

	Or, as Ivanka Trump said in an interview: “My father makes people earn his trust. She’s earned his trust.”

	...Ms. Hicks, who has recently been featured in Marie Claire and GQ, remains loyal, apparently unperturbed by the controversies swirling around her candidate and prepared to stick it out.

	Mr. Trump, asked if Ms. Hicks would have a spot in his administration, replied, “She would definitely have a role.”

	How about press secretary?

	“I don’t want to comment on that,” he said. “It’s too early. I don’t want to be making those prognostications yet. But she’ll certainly be involved with us. She’s terrific.”


https://www.washingtonpost.com/news/the-fix/wp/2017/05/30/this-white-house-statement-on-trumps-positive-energy-reads-like-a-parody/
	White House spokeswoman Hope Hicks issued a statement about President Trump on Monday that is so disconnected from reality that it reads like a parody — like something “Saturday Night Live” cooked up to mimic propaganda.

	Here it is:

		President Trump has a magnetic personality and exudes positive energy, which is infectious to those around him. He has an unparalleled ability to communicate with people, whether he is speaking to a room of three or an arena of 30,000. He has built great relationships throughout his life and treats everyone with respect. He is brilliant with a great sense of humor … and an amazing ability to make people feel special and aspire to be more than even they thought possible.

	Hicks composed the statement in response to a Washington Post report on Trump's habit of cutting down staffers with insults.






And both look like competent agents of influence, having worked in PR and otherwise being accomplished people:


http://fortune.com/2016/03/25/trump-scavino-mcconney-social-media/
	He left the Trump Organization in March 2013, according to his LinkedIn profile, and became director of development at the Joe Torre Safe at Home Foundation in September of the same year. Scavino left the foundation in 2015 and started a PR firm with a website created in April 2015, according to registration records.


https://www.washingtonpost.com/news/powerpost/wp/2015/07/27/hope-hicks-flies-quietly-in-the-eye-of-the-trump-storm/
	“There has always been a very strong connection between politics and entertainment,” Hiltzik said. “Hope has a very good sensibility … She worked in situations that required the same attention to detail and sensitivities that a political campaign would, so it wasn’t much of a stretch for her to make that transition.”


https://www.bloomberg.com/politics/articles/2016-11-11/trump-s-original-four-the-staffers-behind-his-historic-victory
	“Hope has a beautiful mind,” Gigicos said. “She’s probably one of the smartest people that I’ve ever met. If you ask Hope where we were on June 17 at 3 p.m., she can tell you—and she can say what color my tie was.”


And both work in the White House as Trump advisors with responsibilities for "messaging." Trump even created a new position for Hicks:


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/White_House_Director_of_Strategic_Communications
	The White House Director of Strategic Communications is a senior member of the President's staff, reporting directly to the President and working in conjunction with the White House Communications Director.

	President Donald Trump formed the position in late 2016, naming one of his closest advisors and earliest political aides, Hope Hicks, as the nation's first holder of this office.[1]

	The exact responsibilities have yet to be clearly defined, but are assumed to include coordinating media appearances, advising the President on messaging, and serving as a confidant on key matters involving personnel and in executing the President's agenda, an extension of the role Hicks served in the Trump campaign and transition


And Hicks sits closer to Trump than anybody else in the White House:

http://time.com/4658499/donald-trump-white-house-layout/


Scavino and Hicks are said to "understand" Trump and, importantly, are in key positions to influence his "message:"


http://www.businessinsider.com/hope-hicks-bio-trump-spokeswoman-2017-2/#she-still-flies-below-the-radar-directing-the-spotlight-back-onto-trump-the-then-president-elect-called-her-up-to-the-microphone-to-speak-at-a-thank-you-rally-in-december-14
	It's been said she can act as a sort of Trump whisperer, understanding his many moods and professionally executing what needs to be done. She still only calls him "Sir" or "Mr. Trump."


https://www.bloomberg.com/politics/articles/2016-11-11/trump-s-original-four-the-staffers-behind-his-historic-victory
	Scavino was the titular head of the multi-million-strong virtual community called the Trump Train, creating content and building memes that fueled passion for Trump into a victory. He was one of the few who had access to the @realdonaldtrump Twitter account and would send out tweets on Trump’s behalf. “His genius,” Glassner said, “is that he can read the candidate extremely well and understand the messaging he’ll want to put out at any given time, every given day. It’s being a spokesman times a hundred.”


https://www.washingtonpost.com/news/powerpost/wp/2015/07/27/hope-hicks-flies-quietly-in-the-eye-of-the-trump-storm/
	On his plane, Trump flips through cable channels, reads news articles in hard copy, and makes offhanded comments. He’s throwing out his signature bombastic, sometimes offensive tweets. Hicks takes dictation and sends the words to aides somewhere in the Trump empire, who send them out to the world.


http://www.gq.com/story/hope-hicks-mystifying-triumph-donald-trump
	Hicks's job—a sui generis role of outsize importance that she half invents on the fly—involves keeping the media at bay and operating as Trump's chief gatekeeper. But she's also summoned in critical moments of confusion to play instigator and score-settler. It was her job to facilitate Trump's rebuke of the Pope after His Holiness questioned the Christianity of anybody who would build a border wall (kind of Trump's thing). And it was she who helped malign a female reporter who'd been manhandled by Trump's campaign manager, immediately claiming she was a lying attention hound. 


http://www.cnn.com/2017/05/24/politics/trump-pope-francis-white-house-staff/
	Hicks and Scavino, both present for the meeting with Francis, are two of the President's longest-serving aides, both of whom joined Trump's campaign in its earliest stages. Each have played a central role in crafting his public image, through media management and Trump's active social media accounts.


The problem with this is that Trump's "message" has largely helped the goals of Russia's propaganda. For example, Russia has been trying to discredit the mainstream media, which would make it easier for them to spread propaganda with "alternative media."  But Trump attacks the mainstream media right along with them:


https://www.google.com/search?q=site%3Atwitter.com%2FrealDonaldTrump+%22mainstream+media%22


https://twitter.com/realdonaldtrump/status/832945737625387008
	Don't believe the main stream (fake news) media.The White House is running VERY WELL. I inherited a MESS and am in the process of fixing it.


http://www.propornot.com/p/the-list.html


https://www.google.com/search?q=site%3Ainfowars.com+%22mainstream+media%22


https://www.google.com/search?q=site%3Azerohedge.com+%22mainstream+media%22


https://www.google.com/search?q=site%3Aglobalresearch.ca+%22mainstream+media%22


http://www.globalresearch.ca/silencing-the-truth-the-mainstream-media-declares-war-on-the-alternative-media/5563717
	Silencing the Truth? The Mainstream Media Declares War on the Alternative Media

	...The lies perpetrated by MSM are a component of the Military-Industrial Complex. The MSM is a public relations firm that represents the establishment’s hidden agenda disguised as a noble cause to spread “American style democracy” to the rest of the world. Without the MSM, wars cannot be waged. Wars are based on the lies and deceptions provided by Washington and their special interest groups (corporations, lobbyists, etc..) therefore, the MSM’s job is to win the “hearts and minds” of the public with propaganda. 


And during the election, a major goal of Russia's propaganda was to "undermine public faith in the US democratic process." But Trump took a major credibility hit to tell his supporters the election would be rigged, arguably doing the bulk of their work for them:


https://www.dni.gov/files/documents/ICA_2017_01.pdf
	Intelligence Community Assessment

	Assessing Russian Activities and Intentions in Recent US Elections

	...We assess Russian President Vladimir Putin ordered an influence campaign in 2016 aimed at the US presidential election.  Russia’s goals were to undermine public faith in the US democratic process

	...When it appeared to Moscow that Secretary Clinton was likely to win the presidency the Russian influence campaign focused more on undercutting Secretary Clinton’s legitimacy and crippling her presidency from its start, including by impugning the fairness of the election.
	
		* Before the election, Russian diplomats had publicly denounced the US electoral process and were prepared to publicly call into question the validity of the results. 


https://twitter.com/realdonaldtrump/status/787699930718695425
	The election is absolutely being rigged by the dishonest and distorted media pushing Crooked Hillary - but also at many polling places - SAD


http://www.cnn.com/2016/08/01/politics/donald-trump-election-2016-rigged/index.html
	Trump: 'I'm afraid the election's going to be rigged'


http://www.cnn.com/2016/10/18/politics/donald-trump-rigged-election/index.html
	"Remember, we are competing in a rigged election," Trump said at a Wisconsin rally Monday night. "They even want to try and rig the election at the polling booths, where so many cities are corrupt and voter fraud is all too common."

	His accusations alone, experts say, could inflict long-standing damage on the US political system itself by eroding trust in the probity of the electoral process.


http://www.propornot.com/p/the-list.html
	...infowars.com ... zerohedge.com ... globalresearch.ca...


https://www.infowars.com/can-the-2016-election-be-rigged-you-bet/
	Can the 2016 Election be Rigged? You Bet

	We are now living in a fake reality of constructed data and phony polls


http://www.globalresearch.ca/entire-us-presidential-election-is-fake-from-start-to-finish/5544436
	Entire US Presidential Election is Fake, From Start to Finish

	...Election Fraud Through Fractionalized Voting

	...DHS and UN to Take Control of US Presidential Elections?


https://www.infowars.com/high-alert-the-election-can-still-be-rigged/
	High Alert: The Election Can Still be Rigged

	I’m reposting this piece because, amazingly, the vote-rigging system it describes has not gotten widespread attention. The system can be used across the entire US.


http://www.zerohedge.com/news/2016-10-21/new-reuters-poll-shows-70-republicans-think-election-rigged
	New Reuters Poll Shows That 70% Of Republicans Think The Election Is Rigged

	...Obviously, this data is fairly alarming, to say the least, but not terribly surprising in light of the staggering, systemic corruption recently exposed through WikiLeaks


https://www.infowars.com/trump-im-afraid-the-election-is-going-to-be-rigged/
	Trump: “I’m Afraid the Election is Going to be Rigged”

	“I’m afraid the election is going to be rigged, I have to be honest,” Trump told the audience, making reference to how Bernie Sanders lost because his primary race against Clinton was also rigged.


https://www.theguardian.com/us-news/2016/nov/05/election-day-violence-donald-trump-poll-watchers
	 Specter of election day violence looms as Trump spurs vigilante poll watchers

	Advocates say US faces ‘midnight hour of our democracy’ as militia members and neo-Nazi groups take Donald Trump’s claims of ballot rigging seriously


Hicks was the Trump campaign's communications director and Scavino was the "director of social media" during this time. During the campaign and afterward, Trump's "messaging" has also helped Russia attack U.S. surveillance laws and try to foment racial tensions:


https://pastebin.com/aUbjWxEr


https://pastebin.com/zQLx0x4f


Besides helping Trump spread Russian propaganda, Hicks and Scavino have done their own share of weird things during Trump's campaign. Reportedly, Scavino directed some kind of social media attack against Megyn Kelly:


https://twitter.com/DanScavino/status/791095922709200897
	.@MegynKelly made a total fool out of herself tonight- attacking @realDonaldTrump. Watch what happens to her after this election is over.


http://www.businessinsider.com/megyn-kelly-death-threats-trump-supporters-2015-8
	Megyn Kelly reportedly received death threats from Donald Trump supporters


https://www.theguardian.com/media/2016/dec/06/megyn-kelly-donald-trump-social-media-online-abuse
	Journalist Megyn Kelly, who is under armed guard after receiving death threats, has accused Donald Trump’s social media director of stirring hatred on the internet.

	The Fox News host urged Dan Scavino, a member of the presidential transition team’s leadership staff, to stop encouraging hostile and abusive elements online.

	“The vast majority of Donald Trump supporters are not at all this way,” Kelly told an audience in Washington. “It’s that far corner of the internet that really enjoys nastiness and threats and unfortunately there is a man who works for Donald Trump whose job it is to stir these people up and that man needs to stop doing that. His name is Dan Scavino.”


And Hicks "accidentally" emailed a file of opposition research on Hillary Clinton to a politico reporter, which conveniently helped the Trump campaign poach RNC researcher Michael Abboud:


http://www.politico.com/story/2016/05/trump-target-hillary-clinton-whitewater-223570
	Trump plans to target Clinton over Whitewater

	In an email obtained by POLITICO, the Trump campaign asks the RNC to research the scandal.

	By Kenneth P. Vogel and Marc Caputo 05/25/2016

	Donald Trump, who in recent days has accused Bill Clinton of rape and suggested he and Hillary Clinton may have had a role in the death of one of their close friends, plans to focus next on the Whitewater real estate scandal, POLITICO has learned.

	Trump campaign adviser Michael Caputo on Wednesday morning emailed a researcher at the Republican National Committee asking him to “work up information on HRC/Whitewater as soon as possible. This is for immediate use and for the afternoon talking points process.”

	The email was obtained by POLITICO when Trump campaign spokeswoman Hope Hicks, who Caputo copied on his request to the RNC, accidentally responded instead to Marc Caputo, a POLITICO reporter who is not related to the Republican consultant.

	...Hicks, in her errant email, attempted to warn Michael Caputo, not to directly contact the RNC researcher, Michael Abboud, with research requests. But Hicks’ email suggested the researcher may soon be joining the campaign team, which has mostly lacked a robust in-house research operation.

	“He is still an employee of the RNC and we need to be sensitive to that until he comes over to our team full time,” Hicks wrote in the email accidentally sent to Marc Caputo.


http://www.omaha.com/news/politics/donald-trump-names-omaha-native-michael-abboud-communications-coordinator/article_17629332-3d73-11e6-9592-f7d62d8102b9.html
	Donald Trump has hired a native Nebraskan to help with his campaign’s communication.

	Michael Abboud, 26, has been named communications coordinator for the presumptive Republican presidential nominee.


Hicks' and Scavino's roles appear to be more broad than just shaping Trump's message as well. Both are said to have advised Trump on his hiring decisions:


http://www.indystar.com/story/news/2016/12/22/trump-scavino-white-house-social-media-director/95759880/
	In the statement, Trump said Scavino would be among the senior members of his communications team, and the President-Elect referred to the Hopewell Junction man as one of the “key members” of his team during the campaign and transition.


http://www.ctpost.com/local/article/Greenwich-woman-picked-for-Trump-communications-10814286.php
	The 28-year-old was Trump’s campaign communications chief for nearly a year and a half before their surprise Election Day victory. Giving her a White House job was much less of a surprise, since she has been on the transition team making big decisions on the personnel who will assist Trump.


Hicks responsibilities in particular seem to be all over the place, but all of them important:


http://www.ctpost.com/local/article/Greenwich-woman-picked-for-Trump-communications-10814286.php
	Hicks will be merging Trump’s budding legislative agenda with communications, presumably in coordination with Stephen Bannon, the former media executive who is Trump’s chief strategist and senior counselor.

	Hicks declined to comment Thursday, in typical style for a discrete Trump gatekeeper known both as an enforcer — who made campaign employees sign non-disclosure agreements to prevent leaks — and a peacemaker who smoothed ruffled feathers within the Trump team to allow exiled reporters back on the campaign trail.


And Hicks appears to be privy to details on Kushner's meetings with Russian officials, at least when she's talking to Maggie Haberman: 


https://www.nytimes.com/2017/05/29/us/politics/jared-kushner-russia-investigation.html
	Investigation Turns to Kushner’s Motives in Meeting With a Putin Ally

	By MATTHEW ROSENBERG, MARK MAZZETTI and MAGGIE HABERMAN

	...But days earlier, responding to questions from The Times about the meetings with Mr. Kislyak and Mr. Gorkov, Ms. Hicks said the meetings were part of an effort by Mr. Kushner to improve relations between the United States and Russia, and to identify areas of possible cooperation.

	After the first meeting with Mr. Kislyak, she said at the time, the Russian ambassador asked for a follow-up discussion to “deliver a message.” Mr. Kushner sent Avrahm Berkowitz, a longtime associate and now a White House aide. At that session, Mr. Kislyak told Mr. Berkowitz that he wanted Mr. Kushner to meet Mr. Gorkov, Ms. Hicks said.

	Ms. Hicks did not say at the time why Mr. Kislyak had wanted to arrange a meeting between Mr. Kushner and Mr. Gorkov. But she said then that during Mr. Kushner’s meeting with Mr. Gorkov, there was no discussion about the Kushner company’s business or about American sanctions against Russian entities like Vnesheconombank.


Both Hicks and Scavino have "climbed the ladder" to get closer to Trump, are loyal to the point of being creepy, are said to "understand" Trump or have a "bond with him, have constant access to and influence with Trump with murky roles, and help (if not direct) Trump to spread Russian propaganda. If there is any place to look for a Russian conduit to Trump, it's with these two. (Another interesting Trump confidant is Keith Schiller: http://www.cnn.com/2017/04/16/politics/donald-trump-keith-schiller-security/ although any connection between him and Russia is less clear.)

That Hicks and Scavino got involved with the Trumps when they were young (Scavino at 16, Hicks in her early 20's) doesn't free them of suspicion, either. Reportedly, being a Russian spy runs in families:


https://www.wsj.com/articles/SB10000872396390444097904577537044185191340
http://web.archive.org/web/20170317024622/http://www.justicefornorthcaucasus.com/jfnc_message_boards/analysis_opinion.php?entry_id=1343340602&title=russian-spy-ring-aimed-to-make-children-agents
    A Russian spy ring busted in the U.S. two years ago planned to recruit members’ children to become agents, and one had already agreed to his parents’ request, according to current and former U.S. officials.

    When the suspects were arrested in 2010 with much fanfare, official accounts suggested they were largely ineffectual. New details about their time in the U.S., however, suggest their work was more sophisticated and sometimes more successful than previously known.

    ...The effort to bring children into the family business suggests the ring was thinking long term: Children born or reared in America were potentially more valuable espionage assets than their parents because when they grew up they would be more likely to pass a U.S. government background check.

    ...His parents revealed their double life to him well before their arrest, according to current and former officials, whose knowledge of the discussion was based on surveillance by the Federal Bureau of Investigation that included bugging suspects’ homes. The officials said the parents also told their son they wanted him to follow in their footsteps.

    He agreed, said the officials. At the end of the discussion with his parents, according to one person familiar with the surveillance, the young man stood up and saluted “Mother Russia.” He also agreed to travel to Russia to begin formal espionage training, officials said.

    ...Based on their extensive surveillance of the secret agents and their messages to handlers back in Moscow, U.S. counterintelligence officials believe the grooming of Mr. Foley was part of a long-term goal for some of the group’s children to become spies when they got older.


A spy born in the United States would be of high value to Russian intelligence, and one should expect the Russians to use high-value agents to influence Trump.

And there are plenty of weird things going on with Hicks' family, at least, which could be the subject of their own write-up:


https://www.nytimes.com/2016/06/26/style/hope-hicks-donald-trump.html
	Mr. Lewandowski and Ms. Hicks are close friends: He has visited her family in Greenwich for pick-me-up dinners and, days after Mr. Trump clinched the Republican nomination (and fired a key political aide), they took in a Hall & Oates concert with her parents in the V.I.P. tent at the Greenwich Town Party.

	...In fact, Ms. Hicks is the third generation of her family to represent a powerful but highly controversial client. Her grandfather led public relations for Texaco during the 1970s oil crisis.

	Her father, Paul B. Hicks III, represented a major tobacco company in Connecticut and later was the top communications executive for the National Football League, where he dealt with scandals over player safety and the Patriots’ deflated footballs.


As for how the Kremlin might be "communicating" with Trump: Maggie Haberman and some authors at the Washington Post would have you believe Trump's advisors have to set-up some suspicious secret back-channel with the Kremlin. But there's little reason for that if Russian agents are already inside the White House, and such secrecy would only draw attention to their communications. Trump's advisors can communicate with the Kremlin via the media, a technique the Okhrana would have known about for more than a century:


https://books.google.com/books?id=PY2RAgAAQBAJ&pg=PA81
	But dark clouds began to appear over this Okhrana-Bolshevik symbiosis. Lieutenant-Colonel I.P. Vasiliev started a secret campaign, attempting to expose Malinovsky's ties to the Okhrana. He sent a number of anonymous letters to the Menshevik newspaper Luch, stating that Malinovsky was an Okhrana agent. The paper's editors ignored what they considered to be slanders, but rumors began to spread. Vasiliev then wrote an anonymous letter to Lidia Dan, the wife of the Menshevik leader F.I. Dan, offering to meet her secretly and prove that he was a high Okhrana official and that he had evidence of Malinovsky's duplicity. He suggested that Dan signify her agreement to this meeting by a certain newspaper advertisement; she ignored the offer.


https://www.wired.com/2010/06/alleged-spies-hid-secret-messages-on-public-websites/
	Moscow communicated with a ring of alleged spies in America by encoding instructions in otherwise innocent-looking images on public websites. It’s a process called steganography. And it’s one of a slew of high-tech and time-tested methods that the deep-cover agents and their Russian handlers used to pass information — from private Wi-Fi networks to buried paper bags.

	...The G-Men also found a hard drive. On it was an address book with website URLs, as well as the user’s web traffic history. “These addresses, in turn, had links to other websites,” the complaint notes. “Law-enforcement agents visited some of the referenced websites, and many others as well, and have downloaded images from them. These images appear wholly unremarkable to the naked eye. But these images (and others) have been analyzed using the Steganography Program. As a result of this analysis, some of the images have been revealed as containing readable text files.”


http://www.nbcnews.com/id/28366880/ns/technology_and_science-security/t/spy-trick-hides-messages-plain-sight/
	Spy trick hides messages in plain sight

	 In a move likely to thrill conspiracy theorists and government spooks, scientists from Rensselaer Polytechnic Institute are testing the limits of illicit messages hidden inside everyday communications, such as photographs, videos and newspapers.

	"If you open up the communication and it looks just fine, that's a successful communication," said Jeremiah Harmson, who did most of the calculations while working on his doctorate at RPI and now works at Google. "But if you can't read it or it just looks suspicious, then you have failed." 


http://www.theaustralian.com.au/news/world/spies-used-youtube-to-contact-kgb/news-story/719d0ae56fe82bbb10fa564da7154d2e
	A MARRIED couple accused of spying for the Russian secret services for more than 20 years communicated with their KGB masters by leaving encoded comments on YouTube videos.

	In one of the biggest espionage court cases in Germany since the Cold War, the pair, identified only by codenames Andreas and Heidrun Anschlag, are accused of having been planted in West Germany from 1988 by the Soviet Union's KGB and later used by its SVR successor secret service.

	...The pair, who allegedly were jointly paid around 100,000 euros a year, communicated with their Moscow masters using text messages via satellite phone or hidden messages in comments in YouTube videos under agreed names, it heard.


Theoretically, the Kremlin shouldn't even need to use tricks like hiding text messages inside image files for their influence operations either. For example, a Russian agent of influence with a direct line to the Kremlin could simply keep a politically-themed blog about what Trump's next move should be on the issue of the day. This KGB agents blog "advice" could just so happen to be what the Kremlin wants Trump to do next, and Trump's advisors could just so happen to be avid readers of said blog. The point is: it would be possible, and easy, for the Kremlin to get an idea to Trump's head without it looking like anything more than pundits and advisors talking politics.

Such an information channel would be plausibly deniable and--more importantly--perfectly legal (except perhaps violating the Foreign Agents Registration Act). Generally, in countries that have free speech, there is little point in conducting influence operations in ways that break laws--in the end, most influence is just speech.

Knowing the Russians, there are reasons to believe they would operate in this kind of way:

https://www.shape.nato.int/systems/file_download.ashx?pg=15610&ver=2
	These measures have been termed “hybrid warfare” by the academic community, and have been specifically designed so as to circumvent the NATO military collective defense response mechanism since they remain just below the threshold of an overt military attack. Russia loves to exploit legal loopholes. They’ve been doing it quite successfully for centuries. With a shadow of plausible deniability, Russian government-sanctioned covert actions seem designed to cause an effect that on the surface has the appearance of originating from within the affected country/region.


Hicks' "accidental" leaking of an email that led to the Trump campaign hiring Michael Abboud might be one example of using the media to communicate in plausibly deniable ways. After Hick's stunt, all Abboud had to do is open up a newspaper and read that the Trump campaign wanted to hire him--a message "hiding" in plain sight (as for why she didn't just reach out to him directly, according to Hicks' the Trump campaign needed to be "sensitive" about contacting Abboud since he was "still an employee of the RNC").

With this in mind, we can come back to the question: what exactly are the Russians up to with their "fake scandals?" (like the story of Trump leaking the name of a city) One possible reason (among a few) is that they hope to lead the American public and Congressional investigations on a wild goose chase. The American public might reasonably expect there is exist a smoking gun showing some kind of direct and illegal link between Trump and Putin, like a recording of him conspiring with Putin or a secret back-channel. But as we've shown, no such law-breaking link needs to exist for the Russians to be able to influence Trump. And the Russians are (usually) smart--they would know better than to break any laws if they don't have to.

Congressional investigations can take years, and if the Russians can keep-up their fake-scandals long enough, they could have Congress and the rest of America spend the rest of Trump's term searching in all the wrong places for the perfect reason to impeach him, perhaps missing some good ones right under their nose.

Besides wasting time, the Russians can use fake scandals to discredit the mainstream media. Russia's "alternative media" often complains about "Russian hysteria," and if Russia-related scandals in the media started being proved false, it would embarrass the mainstream media and give a smidgen of credibility to alternative media. Putin seems to have this in mind; at least his grin says something: 


https://www.usatoday.com/story/news/2017/05/17/russian-president-vladimir-putin-says-kremlin-willing-turn-over-transcript-president-trumps-meeting-russians/101783808/
	Russian President Vladimir Putin said Wednesday that he is ready to provide the U.S. Senate with a transcript of last week's controversial Oval Office meeting between President Trump and Russian foreign minister Sergei Lavrov that is at the center of allegations that Trump revealed highly classified information.

	"If the U.S. administration considers it possible, we are ready to submit a transcript of Lavrov’s talk with Trump to the U.S. Senate and Congress, if, of course, the U.S. administration would want this," Putin said, according to the Russian-owned Tass news agency.


In a similar way, pointing to fake Trump scandals by Russian agents of influence could be a war for some to throw cold water on the idea that the Russians favor Trump. In previous Congressional hearings, it looks like some Congressmen have winked and nodded at the idea that the Russians could be trying to "undermine" Trump, and therefore they couldn't have aimed to install him as President:


https://www.washingtonpost.com/news/post-politics/wp/2017/03/20/full-transcript-fbi-director-james-comey-testifies-on-russian-interference-in-2016-election/
	TURNER: Thank you.

	I want to go back to the issue of -- Admiral Rogers indicated that the goal of the Russians is to put a cloud on our system to undermine our system. And -- and I would think, certainly today, Mr. Comey, with your announcement of an investigation that the Russians would be very happy with that as an outcome because the cloud of their actions and activities continues and will continue to undermine and until your finished with whatever your investigation is currently in the scope of.

	I want to go back to the issue of how does one open an investigation because again, I'm -- I'm a little confused by -- by some of the things that we hear as to the basis of an investigation. Now, Mr. Comey, if -- if an individual attends a meeting with a foreign leader is -- is that enough to open a counter intelligence investigation?

	COMEY: Without more that somebody met with somebody, no.

	...CONAWAY: Sir, do you believe that the FBI was consistent through early December and on that that was the case. That they -- they assessed that they really wanted Trump to win it and were working to help him win and her lose.

	COMEY: Yes, our analysts had a view that I don't believe changed, from late fall through to the report on January 6 that it had those three elements.

	CONAWAY: All right. So then on December the 9th, well in advance of the January 6th deal, the -- the Washington Post, put out an article. Their least sentence was that this -- and again, CIA, they're not here today but we'll hopefully have them next week, concluded in a secret assessment that Russia intervened in the '16 election to help Donald Trump win the presidency rather than to undermine the confidence in the electoral system. Rather than just undermine it, they don't mention Mrs. Clinton at all.

	And then it says to help Trump elected, the U.S. senior briefed on the intelligence position -- that the U.S. -- that U.S. official briefed by -- briefed on intelligence presentation to U.S. Senators said that's the consensus view. How much did it -- this is written by name Adam Intas Elaine (ph) something and Greg Miller. Do they have drafted you last -- the January 6th document for the Intel Committee.

	COMEY: I'm sorry.

	CONAWAY: Did those writers from the Washington Post help you write the January 6 assessment?

	COMEY: No, they did not.

	CONAWAY: I wonder how they got almost the exact language on December the 9th.


	...STEWART: And I tell you, if you were to tell me and I know you didn't but I'm just saying, if anyone were to tell me that they concluded Mr. Trump is going to win. I'd just say they're nuts, because there was no one in the world who thought that. Every media organization, every political organization, every government organization that I'm familiar with last fall thought that Secretary Clinton would be the next President of the United States.

	COMEY: I think the Russians agreed.

	STEWART: I -- absolutely they did agree. Then this is the point and this is such a fine line, but it's such an important point, and that is how can you know for certain if the Russians were motivated by hurting the person they thought in fact, fully expected was going to be the next President of the United States and comparing that with a mode (ph) of this kind of a Hail Mary pass. You know what, maybe this guy's got a shot. Let's try and help him get elected because those motives would be -- and that's -- that' again coming back to my original point, determining motives is very difficult.

	You have to either have very direct information or you have to be able to get inside someone's head and really figure out what it is that's driving them. And knowing the Russians expected Secretary Clinton to win, would you see that some of those things that they've done would be consistent with undermining her presidency, not necessarily because they thought Mr. Trump was going to win and they wanted help.


Russia's influence operations are sophisticated and layered, and they have plenty of experience--they've been doing this kind of thing at least since Mao, and very likely before then as well. But it is possible to figure out who their agents are and what their up to, or at least make a solid guess. More Americans should know what these operations are and how they work, especially those working in the media or in politics. Russia's activities rely on plausible deniability and secrecy (if not by virtue of being hidden, then by being unnoticed). Once that's taken away, there's not much they can do. And the more people that know, the better.
